The ex-pat-re-invented Brits are having a field-day in my neck of the woods at the moment.
I know 'cause I've already been there
When they work together,
“Oh, listen? Just don’t tell him about the are-u-following-me thing okay?” I whispered to the weird haired guy before Dada could reach the audible distance.
The mice also showed an increase in energy expenditure. When the protein was removed the mice became obese.
This time around Wop destroyed his bars...I still got faith that Touch is holdin' some ill ish', but clearly he probably hasn't kept his game up to par like his homie has, Jesus, that 2nd verse was tuff, even if it was a written (think I remember it from a joint Wop did with Pete Rock or Guru)...We'll cut Toca a break since he was up there trying to cue the tracks, play host and think of some rhymes...
and debt (read: death). You have made it illegal for the People to get
1. I decided I wanted to a writer when I was six.
1) Don't have rooms where there is nothing personal
For spring break 2011 the Strings went to Philadelphia, much like we did the year before. We stayed in the same fabulous hotel room (with the gigantic jacuzzi bath, perfect for entertaining chilled children after a long day of walking in the rain), at the cozy, historic inn in the Jewelry District. The kids loved the dining areas, which have continental breakfast in the morning and warm cookies after 3 p.m. The back dining room also had a floor-to-ceiling library with an eclectic collection of books. Dash pulled encyclopedias while Rosie perused the art books, and both of them generally acted like goofballs.
“I am aware, father.” I glare at him icily. While it was true I had little to no experience on my own, I wasn’t stupid. I knew how to hide, and I knew how to run. Especially now that I was free of those useless shoes. “Not unless one of them is on your precious list, then I suppose it would be handy for you if they just had their way with me.”
how much money was in my bank account
ii) They only appears in the middle of the night and are afraid of the sunlight. A fag?
Though Winston covered a dazzling array of subjects in this interview, one thing that really stood out for me was the fact that these liens constitute legal arrest warrants for the Federal Reserve conspirators.
City Council Member Bill de Blasio, who's no longer running for BP but instead for Public Advocate, tells Dovere that his planned platform--that the BP should push back more against development (a bit late for him, right?)--is no longer operative.
Maybe I'm just partial to the regional breweries (Great Lakes, Bell's, etc.), but I really haven't tasted a beer that I didn't enjoy from Bell's. I will be looking to add a few of their brews to my list after we get through the next few months before the wedding.
Since it is Spring, and garden season, I wanted to share this cake my friend and I made last year.
This statement, like the vast majority of Rush's words, if full of lies, twists of facts, omissions and self-serving phraseology. He starts early :
There is absolutely no reason for this song, I just love it and I hope you do too. There was no video on YouTube, so just lie back and enjoy the music!
Behold, he who keeps Israel
Means: "No one will ever see us alive again."
Letting go or selling my little apartment is part of this shift. Yesterday, I spoke to a real estate agent, who said that they were giving me a reality shift about the real estate market. I loved their choice of words: I couldn’t believe they actually said: reality shift, but truly they did, because that, of course, allowed me to tell them about my blog. (Which they liked, naturally.)
I had always wondered about reenactors of various wars. Hadn’t we done our best to end them, to heal and move forward? I can see dressing up in clothing from another era, but why would anyone want to reenact a bloody battle?
Naturally, Cinderbark Wood is in a desert and the only water for miles around is a spring at the forest’s heart.
Menma: Oh…
For the most part, Ice Cream Sandwich is an exercise in making things slicker and faster than Honeycomb, but there are a few cosmetic changes that you can see on the Acer Iconia Tab A200.
Terrific Tastemakers- the media and personalities that make the food world sizzle, from Favorite Food TV Personality to Favorite Food Blog
Needless to say I was quite disappointed in their response, I was curious to know what all this mare might know and where she had been for the previous years ( I could trace her from the time she got to MN). She was a gorgeous wild bay color with an exotic dried clearly Arabian head, her conformation was quite nice too although she wasn't a big mare by any means ( 14.2-3). Mainly Polish bloodlines she was quite exotic looking. She had this quirky way of swinging her head when she wanted to see something, although her sight was fine in both eyes. Although to my knowledge she had no formal training of any type, I taught her to stand for a halter class, and entered her in the county fair once. She was so afraid before we entered that arena that she stood quietly next to me and trembled. She trusted me though and I think she knew I wouldn't let any harm come to her. Anyway, we took home the Champion Pleasure Mare trophy as well as the Best of 3 pleasure mares class. It was quite an exciting year for the Erickson household! I didn't ask Promise to show again, she had more than proved her worth at that show. I knew there was a chance she was in foal because my stallion had pasture bred her a couple of times in the spring. By the end of Sept 2004 it was clear she was in foal. I started checking her to see if I could feel the baby kicking in her. Low and behold, I could! This was more cause for celebration, so we invited our friends over for "feeling the baby kick" parties... She was a champ through all of this. Not knowing when she was officially bred ( and not wanting to spend the money to check), in Jan of 2005 I hauled her over to a good friend's house to foal her out ( she was already starting to bag up.) Her filly was born March 28th. I already had plans for Promise's foal, I gave her to a very good friend of mine for her 21st birthday ( that is another whole story). Promise was a terrific mother, but a terrible stall horse, she walked and walked and walked, made Darcie crazy, I am sure she was delighted when we finally brought Promise home...
However, a situation came up recently where this person had to be acknowledged, not because of their own merit but due to family connections. Not only did this person need to be acknowledged, but I had to interact with them on a personal level. I objected to this and was becoming emotional as anger that was buried was rising to the surface. All of my arguments were shot down - "Be the bigger person." "It's family..we have to." I was bitter and hard all the way to the front door, remembering more reasons why to distrust this person. I wanted to be as disrespectful as I could because they didn't deserve it. "Be the bigger person." Fine. If I can't forgive.. and I can't forget.. all I can do is fake it. I'll be so big and generous that they'll be shocked.
They laughed when he skewed the horizon over the visionless Alblackica sea
AppleBees Gift Card: Allison D
The sermons to go along with these Bible School lessons are now available. Click the link: 90 Days with Jesus, John’s Gospel and you will have access to 17 of 18 of the sermons (I have to retype one) and the box.net links. Thanks, jerry
Fairy Dancing DVD: Lisa L
Hi! Today's card is a Clear Dollar Stamp Digi Card; it's a valentines day card. Perfect because Valentines day is just around the corner! This would be a perfect image and sentiment for any valentine card. The images I used came from the set Rose Bloom in the Clear Dollar Stamp Store that was released last month (January).
Twine: The Twinery
So, at the moment I am just doing a little each day and I am just going to play it by ear. I would like to have my little shop up and running in the next month or so but I'll see how I go.. 2012 is all about taking it easy for me!
Rating: 3 out of 5 boxes
Another high character guy that will work his tail off. No injury issues and solid pick by the raiders.
The Beauty of Spiritual Experiences
1 pound smoked kielbasa or Polish sausage, julienned
The couple moved away.
So if I would’ve known posting about An Hour in A Day yesterday would’ve jinxed me, I probably would’ve waited till next week to join! I should’ve known when I was on the phone before 9 am talking with the Bestie and making yet more appointments.
I've also been surprised, given the complexity of the problems the city has faced, to find that there is a lack of information about exactly what has happened in the city during a certain time period in the 1980's while Carl Officer was Mayor. Some of it has to do with the fact that it happened before the internet, But sometimes I think it's more than that. Sometimes I think that there is some sort of collusion not to talk in detail about these things, but why?
Where are you? Why did you decide to leave me when I was in Lubbock? The day I got back I needed you and you were not there. It resulted in a disaster with Loaf Pan. He is probably kind of pissed at you, since he is still soaking and it doesn't seem like this random-mixture-that-would-have-been-better-as-sugar-cookies-instead-of-a-"cookie-cake" is ever coming out. I promise to defend you against Loaf Pan's might if you come back.
As for the Iranian power projection and its geopolitical future coupled to the absence of sanctions and transformation of relations with major powers into cooperation, it is understood that the Iranian regime should at first realize where it came short in its economic model.
2. love the creative process
together we watched
‘No, it IS still a day off’.
9:14 James Carville is speaking on CNN. I am suddenly ill. David Gergen is rightly criticizing the structure of the “show” as not understanding how to grab the audience. He’s rightfully critical about Jim Leach’s speech as being boring and losing the audience signing on at the top of the hour.
When I said there was nothing new, I think that was meant to be part of the idea behind the film. The current ghost face is rebooting the original film with a bunh of new kids who mirror the original cast. It was possible to have fun with the idea, but its falls flat in execution. I chalk it up to dividing screen time between the new kids and the old guard. There was not enough crossover between their respective plights to merit such a thing. It is another reason the old guard should not have appeared. The spotlight would have been exclusively on the new kids. The audience was bound to be full of dedicated fans. They would have gotten the homage to the original film without the old cast there. Probably would have been more amusing, to boot.
Table set with every dish possible
Syncopate the Synchronous!
We commend the House of Representatives for its painstaking consideration and adoption of the report in two days with some amendments. This shall go down in history as one act of redemption by a chamber of the National Assembly that has not done much since 1999 to endear itself to the people it represents.
Only a cock stood on the rooftree
Overall setting, especially District 12: The set designers and animation people nailed pretty much everything. The Capitol, the arena, brief views of unrest in District 11, and even the lavish train and lodgings at the training facility were all amazingly realized with excellent attention to details that evoke the atmosphere of the book. D12, however, was, with one glaring exception listed below, absolutely amazing. I was concerned going in because the Reaping scenes in the trailer seemed so sterilized and clean, but seeing the Hob, various areas in the Seam, and interiors of Katniss’ family’s home quickly alleviated those concerns. D12 is dirty and dilapidated, the people look beaten-down and hungry, except for Katniss and Gale (more on this below), and the overall effect helps set up the class dynamic that could have been elided since we don’t have Katniss’ interior thoughts and memories.
Nutrition
We love that we have cultivated
That’s when I would get sent to my room. I cry foul, though. I thought that was a very good question. Okay. Say a little shepherd boy is sitting against a tree, watching sheep. Up creeps a wolf. Shouldn’t the wolf attack the kid first? And this was my reasoning. Sheep have a lot of fur and if the wolf would try to eat it, there would be a lot of fur in its mouth. But, eating a boy would be easy. No fur, just right to the body. I knew that when I was young. But, then again, maybe wolves don’t think humans are tasty. I really didn’t know. Or care. I was just pulling an April Fool’s joke, dammit.
Right to assembly negated by violence
It all started when I began fearing for my car. In recent months, the Reynoldsburg Walmart parking lot has become a teeming Thug Central, and My-Husband-The-Cop doesn’t like me shopping there, what with the auto thefts and car-jackings and stabbings and whatnot. He’s funny like that.
the system is costly, adding an estimated €100,000 to the price of the trains, as well as generating a three-fold increase in infrastructure costs. APS is therefore only used in central Bordeaux and, at specific points on each line (such as the one pictured below on Rue des Frères Bonie), trams raise their overhead masts and switch back to more conventional means of power supply for the remainder of their journey. But the aesthetically-pleasing "look-no-cables" APS has been adopted for tram projects in Angers, Reims (both of which opened in
Reid Weingarten, a lawyer for Ms. Stevens, couldn’t be reached. A spokeswoman for the Justice Department declined to comment.
The last couple of weeks, I have spent more time in prayer, along with fasting and found myself in a great place last Friday night as I took the stage as part of a worship team for the Women of Faith conference that was held at the Chestnut Center in Marshfield...the preparation of the previous weeks carried over through Saturday night, and briefly into Sunday, where I let go of what I had.
I kill people for a living. Fictionally, of course.
In the meantime there is something we can all do and that is to enlighten someone, even if you only awaken one person to the truth, then there are two of you, and that way leads to thousands. We do not need a majority to change the world, only enough to be heard, and then we'll have a majority.
UPDATE: 6th April, 2011. There is reporting in today’s Irish media about yesterday’s appointment of an administrator to some McInerney UK companies. The Irish Times reports that US investor Oaktree is still lurking in the background and interested in investing in both the Irish and UK operations. And separately that it was two UK banks, Lloyds and Royal Bank of Scotland that orchestrated the administation procedure. Interestingly the Irish Times claims that the examinership appeal to the Supreme Court by McInerney in Ireland will take place at “the start of next month”. The Irish Independent reports that yesterday’s action in the UK has resulted in 14 job losses there and that the seven companies affected employed 161 staff.
Everyone will have until Sunday night to complete the hop. Winners will be announced Monday morning!!
I enjoy spending time with my guides but, I especially like this one. I call him my teacher. He has very little to say yet, his messages are always powerful. His words resonated deep into my soul.
Brouwerij De Koninck NV De Koninck Amber
impermissibly vitiate claim limitations. See Freedman Seating Co. v. Am. Seating
over amber Assam
Now that's romance!
But Gehry didn't quite say, as he's been quoted, that he had the opportunity "to build a neighborhood from scratch." The press reported that, but Gehry actually said "practically from scratch."
Result: Scott Ettling by Unanimous decision (30-27, 30-27, 29-28)
Bosses not around, means a longer lunch break (self declared) ...lol! Hope my bosses are not reading it! With a few of my colleagues, we sneaked out to Swensen's at Thomson Plaza (very near to my new office) for lunch. Swensen's a causal dining family restuarants which have outlets in Singapore island wide. Trying to use up the Groupon which was expiring in September 2011. I been buying lots of groupon deals recently, just gave me more excuses to dine out and buying the deals can be quite addictive. Do you agree with me? Anyway we had a very heavy lunch that afternoon! Quality of food is at expected standard, no surprise with some hits and misses but again was a very good deal!
The thing I find hardest to stomach about Apollo is his murder of the original priestesses of Delphi, and his wholesale stealing of their cult. Because that’s what the ‘Arrows of the Sun’ story is all about. I don’t like it when matriarchal societies are trampled—that’s the feminist in me coming out. Hermes was the one I voted for. It’s that pure cheekiness and effrontery about him which I love—and the story where he steals Apollo’s cows when he is only a baby makes me laugh every time. I just think he’d be the most fun to be with—but then I’ve always been on the side of the bad boys and the rebels!
I love the comfort of home with the children playing, the sight of the rain replensihing my gardens and the sound of the pitter patter on my tin roof ... it's perfect weather to create the sweet aroma of banana bread!
which never washes me clean
31. Invincible Summer Hannah Moskowitz
the proof:
Ismae is able to escape from a planned marriage. Her next stop is the sanctuary at the convent of St. Mortain, the saint of death. She learns well and then is given a big assignment!
As I've not been logging into this blog for a while I'm only just beginning to catch up on the hundreds of new posts.. I'll get there I'm sure (in a few months!).
They did not go mad; how 13 men could go mad!
35) Astrid y Gastón (Lima, Perú)
‘For you’ I say, as if it’s a gift I have just bought and wrapped. ‘I’m sorry I forgot.’
The shuttle stops over there, baby. Be about a 20 minute wait."
No thanks, Valerie, no thanks…
Don't judge.
Gallagher maintains that the rivalry was conceived by the magazine NME and members of Blur's entourage as a ploy to raise their respective profiles on the back of Oasis' success and that since this point he has had no respect for either party. However, Albarn has suggested the roots of the feud were much more personal. Albarn is now reluctant to talk about the feud, feeling the whole affair - his own actions included - were embarrassing.
Happy Weekends to all!
Standard of Care: It may seem intuitive that you will not receive the same care if you were forced to choose between a large metro hospital and a small, rural clinic. One has the opportunity for advanced testing, state-of-the art equipment, etc.. One would hope that the care would be comparable, but one expects some variances. The “standard of care,” in the legal sense, is this idea. It defines what a local physician, typically, would do when faced with a given set of circumstances. For example, what would the protocol be for a patient complaining of pain in her foot, entering through ER, and stating that a rock fell on her. The standard would be to A, B, and C. Probably something like check for a broken bone (x-ray), check for infection, etc..
Natalia will recall these stories and others to guide her grandfather’s wandering soul on its return home (and to come to terms with her own grief). Her narrative will lay bare the history of Galina. The town where her grandfather was raised and where the tiger’s wife lived and died—Natalia will retell grandfather’s story of the Tiger’s Wife, and perhaps, she will add some embellishments to make the story her own.
Cold soba for the boys today, decorated with pandas made from quail eggs. It's fast and simple to do, which left me with some time in the morning to do up a tutorial. So, hope you will find it useful if you want to try it out. :)
(Holy pillows-&-blankets, if you type the word "sleep" so many times, after a while it just doesn't look right. ...)
When it comes to looking good, no one does it better than the Norwegian curling team!
Turnips, 1/2 , but onto small pieces
The issue at hand is anti-gun, agenda-driven journalism that we are constantly inundated with. We know the 870 is a good gun, and gun owners know that too, but the fact that our media is constantly trying to over sensationalize these types of stories is ignorant and dangerous, and so we’ve decided to take a stand.
As you may well know, I've been an active member of East Dulwich Writers' Group for over a decade. Without them, I would probably never have completed a novel, let alone have two published and be able to earn my living as a freelance editor and creative writing tutor.
We left them in the fridge for a couple of months, until we noticed that a bit of fungus was growing on top of the soil. At this point, we thought perhaps we'd messed up the process, and just put the pots out on the porch and decided we'd see what happened. Within a week or so, green shoots started to appear, and within a month, we had tulip blooms!
long week....lots of things happening. we went to biloxi, mississippi, came home and then had a surprise visit from some of our kids....mr savannah left on wednesday, so there were lots of last minute things to do. it has been hectic.
in his first marriage. I gave him a confidence that he was worthy to receive love. That he was truly the greatest guy in the world for me. I encouraged him in everything he did. I wanted him to be happy inside. I think I succeeded.
That excerpt came from an ESPN.com article and it’s not made clear in the article where Brown made the remarks. Are they what got him in trouble? Were they made in response to the controversy? It doesn’t really matter because he’s dead on the mark.
the girl opens her mouth in response to some generic questioning from the journo saying:
“Bondholders could have serious claims on their hands,” said Gradman. “You’re going to suffer a loss as bondholder if you can’t foreclose, if you can’t liquidate that property and recoup.”
I’m afraid of tight spaces. Lately, with my stress and anxiety levels through the roof, I am noticing that tight spots are getting me really claustrophobic. I get the feeling that the walls are closing in on me and I need to get out —-and quick! Not a good combo when you have a one bedroom home to share with three people and four animals.
Continuing market volatility and uncertainty means that the original reattribution offer for the inherited estate no longer meets our critical test of being fair to both policyholders and shareholders. We are working closely with the policyholder advocate to see how we can restructure our offer.
"yes" she told me. "I like to change my clothes after nap time"
A number of questions I’d like to know the answers to.
Lately I feel like I don't have much to wear. Oh I have pretty dresses and skirts - which I do wear - but not a whole lot of everyday stuff. Most of my summer go-to's have been packed away because they are too big in the bust. So, I have decided to make myself some things for summer that will get worn over and over; easy stuff that won't need special laundry care.
We meditated together, then the channel went one by one staring into our eyes. Some women saw the face of their mother as she stared at them. She looked like a holy woman to me, a wild, beautiful shaman surrounded by a golden light. She transformed. She oozed good medicine. As she came around, I felt a jolt of electricity and something like fear. My heart raced, and I saw flashes of experiences, like a film of a life passing before my eyes. I looked up to the Buddha above her head.
Their reverberations, harpies in side my skull.
“These threats,” USCIRF Chairman Leonard Leo said, “should be taken seriously, especially given Boko Haram’s coordinated attacks on Christmas Day, when suicide bombers attacked churches in five different cities in central and northern Nigeria.” CNS News
And this is the sort of enrichment brought to our country by the Roma which according to the liberal elite is good for us!
The trees at Alice’s point of entry towered over her and seemed to glare menacingly whilst simultaneously welcoming her in with branches outstretched like great gnarled arms, and indeed, as Alice crossed the threshold of the forest she turned her head to see if some knobbly and gnarled fingers weren’t reaching out to grasp her from behind.
-Keeps the beer fresher
My sister and brother-in-law are leaving TOMORROW (on a jet plane, don't know when they'll be back again... No. Really.) for Hong Kong, and a bazillion other places- for the better part of the entire year! Here's their loose plan:
Saturday, November 11, 2006 8:00 PM
Oh well. I guess I’ll just keep lusting over him from afar. He won’t let me do anything else.
I noticed about a two weeks ago that Pinkie was getting pretty stinky. I thought she might have diarrhoea, so I moved her frequently and kept her water up. It did not improve. I Googled and decided to bring her inside. We put her in a container with clean, dry towels. Gave her a lovely big bath and dried her off. Varied up her diet and provided heaps of water and cuddles and company. Her urine was stained red (hard to see on the grass). Dr Google said a urinary tract infection or bladder stones. She seemed to improve a bit, but this last week was very skinny and not very happy.
Perhaps all writers should be medicated, if only to free them from their terrible Muse. (God knows, I’ve tried the entire pharmacy.) But the medications – booze, pills, dope, whatever – get in the way of the words and so I have to rid myself of pain killers. The words rule. The words dictate. The words sap and diminish. The words destroy. The words kill.
I am already a star, whether I was created a star or I was born a star, or was made a star, or I achieved stardom. The question now is how do I get my star to keep on rising? That is the crucial thing we want to discuss very briefly tonight.
There is another significant ‘we’, though. Hendrix is married in both life and work to Helen LaKelly Hunt, a psychologist. Together, they co-founded the Institute for Imago Relationship Therapy. Alone, Dr. LaKelly Hunt has become a leading feminist, elected to the U.S National Women’s Hall of Fame for her work, and founder of the Sister Fund, a small, private foundation that supports “fullness of life” for women and girls.
Must be my week for welfare scams. . .
I've been trying to come up with things to do that are inexpensive and fun. I don't have an income for the next seven weeks! We went to see the fireworks on Canada day, the kids have been enjoying the sprinkler, and i'm trying to do one small organizing project each day .. yesterday I did the furnace room which took me about half an hour but what a difference! I'm also thinking about painting the kitchen as it hasn't been done since we moved in five years ago .. I think it's time. What have you all been up to?
“He was not exposed to drugs and alcohol. He was not exposed to chaos. He has demonstrated significant change in attitude, thoughts and behaviour,” Smelko said.
How and when is a person diagnosed bipolar? It helps to know that it is very difficult to diagnose because so many symptoms overlap and some people, like myself, don't go to the doctor with a laundry list of "how I feel today, yesterday or 10 years ago!" So what happens when you are diagnosed bipolar? Diagnosis usually follows some sort of crisis incident ~ and that term is relative. In my case, following my past for over 40 years told my doctors that I had been bipolar for at least that amount of time. Typically bipolar is diagnosed at a much younger age.
Once I make it through the holidays, it's back to getting some Jane blocks done!
Gloria Deo
Varanasi: holy city of the Ganges.
Life and Limb 2
A: You keep bringing up Santa, did you not get any presents when you were little?
We were giving Harleigh lunch this weekend and Zak asked Harleigh if she washed her hands.
This is a really timeless little book. It has echoes of Enid Blyton, what with the secret tunnels and the planning for adventures in a nearby woodland, and reminded me a little of the Carbonel series by Barbara Sleigh (another children's novel where the magic and mundane collide). I feel as though The 13 Treasures could be picked up and enjoyed by children in years to come, thanks to the ageless feel of the story.
Taking care of yourself is every bit as important as taking care of your loved one. Without you, who would they have? And if you are in a position to help a care giver get a break from the day-to-day, offer your help. In fact, don’t just offer, set up a date for it to happen (or you and I both know it won’t). Even if it is just providing companionship for several hours while the care giver gets out of the house you will have given them the sustaining break that they may need.
measures approx. 11" tall
Think Long Term
I haven’t read “The Waste Land” for a year, and I never did bother to check all the footnotes. But I will hazard these statements—Eliot contains the same ecstatic vision which runs from Münzer to Yeats. However, he retains a grounding in the social reality/order of his time. Facing what he perceives as a choice between ecstatic chaos and lifeless mechanistic order, he accedes to maintaining a separation of asexual purity and brutal sexual reality. And he wears a stoical face before this. Read his essay on Tradition and the Individual Talent, as well as Four Quartets, when he’s less concerned with depicting moribund Europe, to catch a sense of what I speak. Remember how I said there’s a certain kind of conservatism which I respect more than bourgeois liberalism—Eliot is of this type. Of course, the dichotomy he maintains is reactionary, but it’s due to a deep fatalism, not ignorance. (Counter him with Yeats or Pound, who, arising from the same milieu, opted to support Hitler and Mussolini.) And this fatalism is born out of the relation between fertility and death, which I touched on in my last letter—life feeds on itself. A fatalism I share with the western tradition at times. You seem surprised at Eliot’s irreconcilable ambivalence; don’t you share this ambivalence yourself, Alex?
My parents did not really agree. Or maybe they did, but they still wouldn't let me have one.
2. Katrina Parker (Team Adam) – “Jar of Hearts” This song choice seemed fairly predictable for me. Katrina went for the time-honored practice of singing against a sparse piano in order to give her voice maximum wiggle room. As a result, I kind of felt like she was going though the motions. To me she started out strong but got lukewarm about halfway into the piece. It’s not that she was coasting, for she seemed committed to beaming the song out until the end, but the end result felt flat. It was a solid effort.
furiously: ‘Maybe when I’m away from all of you stressing me out a baby will come. Everyone gives me s*** about not being pregnant. Stress makes people not get pregnant.’
research efforts on satisfaction alone may well be your survival. Make it a differential positive experience-whether it is the food, service, sales experience, or process.
Miracle.
And they won’t still unless the sperm donor comes forward, which he is under no obligation.
Anyway, people were just randomnly circulating their sheets and I didn't even know where the hell the pile went. The professor said to hand it in at the back of the room. Later, when lecture ended, I went on a break like everyone else (we get a 10 minute break before tutorial begins). It didn't cross my mind to leave my paper at the back then, and I figured I'd drop it after tutorial ends. Fast forward to tutorial, professor's gone (She stays for lectures only since tutorials are just movie screenings) AND so is the pile!!! FML. I emailed the prof...and??
It’s worth pointing out that there is nothing particularly shocking about a dwarf’s genitals. They are no smaller, on average, than those of a normal-sized man. Yet this very quality makes them appear unnaturally large on their undersized bodies. Women are often caught out by this optical illusion and unduly flustered as a result.
Bob Dylan – If you See Her, Say Hello – Bllod on the Tracks (1974)
We were riding over the mountain with that song in the background when Tyler turned to me and said, "This song has always reminded me a lot of our relationship."
I’m not getting any sort of goodbye…thing. This is actually a bit irritating to me.
“You are crying,bachche ! ” Aham stopped and whispered to my face while struggling with my stole to make sure my head was properly covered.
5. BEAUTIFUL SHOW in Japan
Consider this photo a rough draft of our welcome baskets. I'm still on the hunt for little packets of sunscreen and/or aspirin. Also, a little closer to our wedding date, we'll have the task of making sugar cookies using the Mississippi-shaped cookie cutter and then packaging them with 'Welcome to Miss.' labels. Annnnd, I still have to make a Welcome Note packet for everyone including some directions and favorite restaurants around town -- I found the cutest white scalloped-edged notecards at Target to use. And, if that's not enough, I'd like to find little tags to hang on the handle with baker's twine with the couple or family's name. Whew.
I’m distracted into misreading Access Chiropractic’s sign as a way to pad this week’s Website Review of Dr. Jeffrey M. Muschik’s internet presence. It’s a site with only a few pages of pulldowns, which I’ll begin mocking in just a moment. I chose to include the sign in front of their Celanese Road storefront as part of their new-media promotional push just to flesh things out a little.
After the birth of Mars' sons Romulus and Remus, the king orders them to be left to die in the Tiber River. When the basket in which the twins were placed washes up on shore, a ‘lupa’ (wolf) suckles them and a woodpecker named Picus feeds them until the shepherd Faustulus finds the twins and brings them into his home.
to music. "It's to do with our English temperament, it's hard for us
There is also an archaeological site in Old Cahawba, which incidentally is where Alabama's first state capitol was built. After massive flooding in 1865 the county seat was moved to nearby Selma. Today you can visit Old Cahawba and the various surviving buildings of this ghost town. There are guided tours for a fee or self guided tours available.
Daughter may or may not come up today. I enjoy her company but I miss US. We used to be able to do so much together but not now. Maybe when the baby is older she can get a free day now and then. I look forward to that time.
Björk & David Arnold Play dead IS
I know that we wanted to drive up to the mountains and go see the Franklin Mountains State Park, and that we wanted to get Jacob's glasses fixed at Wal-Mart. Captain America and I might go see a movie after the little kids go to bed. Other than that, just a fun Saturday at home. Since Captain America and I are both trying to lose some unwanted holiday pounds, we're for-going on the Chocolate/sweets, so that takes a lot of the "umpf" out of Valentines day - hehehe. See where my mind is - TOTALLY on the food - ha!
I miss Mark, often.
Indeed, I wore a down jacket with faux-fur trimmed hood - as did just about every other woman there. It caused a lot of confusion on the coat rails afterwards, as designer Sara Eberle can testify ...
Brodsky asked Pinsky how much the Yankees have requested.
Nigerian youths by giving them
“No. Dr. Hamilton and I were friends.” Her gaze fell to the ground. She didn’t want him to know she had considered the possibility of being more, but now…
As Various Positions opens, fourteen-year-old Georgia Slade is struggling with the sudden interest in sex at her high school, where parties have begun to feature a disturbing game called Chicken, and is about to audition for the Royal Toronto Ballet Academy. Her parents are fighting: her mother, Lena, is depressed and her father, Lawrence, whom she worships, is utterly uninterested in her audition, since ballet is feminine rather than feminist, and he wants (or thinks he wants) his daughters to be serious-minded.
I generally try to keep everything under control and avoid dwelling too much on the past, I guess the distractions, good and bad, of recent times have helped in that respect and I generally like to keep busy. Things do get past my defences though. A few weeks ago I received by decree absolute, something that I knew was on it's way and that really is only the final piece of paperwork to confirm the end of my marriage. I thought I was prepared for it, but I wasn't, it was still incredibly upsetting.
New, privately developed apartment complexes there – the exact same apartment complexes of visual interest to architecture magazines such as the one for which I work – might, in the end, simply be too small and too cramped to become anything other than the slums of tomorrow.
“Great, thank you so much,” I said. “By the way, how many runners to you have in the race?”
"What if I am?
Unibroue Don de Dieu
August found me in Venice, at a "Writers' Boot Camp" on the Grand Canal, working on the adult novel I've written and am now restructuring. There's nothing like swapping ideas with two other writers over prosecco and olives on a terrace overlooking that green water and spotting egrets.
Give students a list of vocabulary words on index cards or small cards on cardstock.
My children came to school with me. We enjoyed Newcastle town.
No wonder clients think ad agencies have lost the plot.
Each year I look at Lent as a time to cleanse my soul; refresh my spirit; and let go. This year I’ve decided to hold on. I’m holding on to grudges, hurts, disappointments, and hate and ‘staring them square in the eye.’ I’m forcing myself to encounter my own sinfulness. I’m examining the times when I have failed to love. Self-examination is not for the faint of heart but I’m reminded that God is always with me. Even during my lowest points I have not been abandoned.
Brent asked that his surgery not be publicized as he didn't want to make a big deal about it :-( but it seems he had a change of heart and let his parents post about it on the "official update blog". He is making such progress and is understandably disappointed to have to be going back in for surgery which will require a few days to a week hospital stay and missed therapy appointments. We were with him on Saturday night and he was in good spirits and positive as always.
An additional supervisor from the Office of Professional Responsibility will now accompany the “jump teams” that bring vehicles for motorcades and other transportation, the officials said. Agents involved in the Colombia incident were part of such a jump team.
My favorite performance though was one of his last - Irish mobster, and florist, Fergie Colm in the Ben Affleck directed film The Town. Menacing, fearless, understated and terrifying, the scene where he's pruning roses while he tells Affleck how he got his mother hooked on drugs before she killed herself is a master class in acting.
To celebrate I am going to have a giveaway!
Uhm, his wimpy-ness. He just isn’t as motivated by passion as they were.
To apply this I use a Sigma F80 that I lightly spray with Avene Thermal Water and I couldn't dream of a better finish. This applies so easily, and blends beautifully. I finish this off with powder, but it really isn't necessary as the finish once dry is so natural; it feels just like your skin, but better. The bottle makes claims of it having 16 hour wear, which I have not tested, but from the 8-10 hours I have worn it, it has stayed remarkably well. Even around my nose, where my glasses sit, it stays on my face (not smeared into the nose curve of my frames.) A most excellent thing.
So you know the question. What are some examples of how filmmakers or authors externalize the main character's INNER AND OUTER DESIRE?
At an adoption conference last fall, a wise mom who has adopted many more children than I have told me, "If your well runs dry, everyone around you goes thirsty."
before she sleeps in the sand?
Post 101 of 180
But in their comments, companies warned NTIA to focus only on drafting voluntary guidelines, not mandatory rules.
I have had a busy day today. Meetings, phone calls, emails and reports. The kind of day that goes by quickly but when it is all done it really doesn’t feel all that productive. The plus side is I completely forgot about lunch until around two O’clock when I finally had a couple of pouches of tuna.
According to the Women's Legal History Biography Project at Stanford University, Lorna E. Lockwood chalked up a number of "firsts" during her long career as an Arizona attorney and judge.
Will I ever consider giving it a second chance?
I dreamt of a house
You know what would be great? To be a fly on the wall during one of these high-level Hollywood meetings where the art department shows the execs their concepts for the lousy junk they intend to use as advertisement.
So far, today is a total failure, and I feel as if I can't do it. I am so disappointed in myself for getting to this point, where I am incapable of walking - let alone running - even around the block.
I started by mixing some paint and a few drops of water. You want the paint thin enough to use with the squirt gun but not so thin that it just runs down your paper.
Was there a holy sword? Yes. Magical armor? Yes. Girdle of Giant Strength? Yes.... You get the idea.
Postcard number four is from Alyona in Russia. It shows the Great Palace and the Great Cascade built between the years 1715 – 1724. She says “the palace is one of the most beautiful in Russia. It was founded by Tzar Peter the first”. I’m finding that I love Russian architecture! I’ve been lucky enough to get several postcards with Russian buildings on them and I have loved them all. Beautiful!
While we are with Leeks... how about a
Back to my response at seeing that headline: I was incensed! I was angry not at the writer of the article, but at the religious spirit that so overshadows the American Church…that religious spirit that makes people too heavenly minded to be any earthly good! I used to live there.
authorities to assist in investigating the series of payment into this
By the time she was five and in kindergarten we learned that she actually was different from her peers. I would get nearly weekly phone calls from the teacher. The teacher said my Aspie was very bright and knew the answers, but she wouldn’t do the worksheets and she kept getting distracted by everything. She would also cry, a lot. And she would nearly miss the bus every day. My Aspie moves at her own speed and no matter how much you say, “quick, quick, like a bunny” and clap your hands it doesn’t do much.
Yet the Ombudsman said her office’s investigations into the cases of 10 people over 65, which took place between 2009 and last year, showed the “stark contrast” between the NHS’s stated principles and the treatment patients received.
Except for certain, probably rare, planned public manifestations, most initiates of secret societies are never known, and what you are allowed to see really means little.
"What’s so funny?”
"Fill out this form and send it back."
This tiny taste of success has naught but whetted my appetite for more. MORE!
Passe Simple - Viens Vers Moi (Extended Version)
SH: Yes. It had high fructose corn syrup. I am morally opposed to HFCS.
Beyond both the real & the made-up windows
Mick Jagger, while no doubt having had a very similar experience (probably multiple times), was writing this song as a reaction to all the puritanical parents who were sure that the Rolling Stones were a bad influence on their impressionable teenage daughters. He was going, “yeah, well how ‘bout this?”
After fermentation and six weeks of lagering this beer turned out great. Very crisp, clean, and bitter. I'm very happy with it. It placed third out of eight entries as a German Pilsner in the light lager category of the Olde Hickory Pro-Am in North Carolina a couple weeks ago.
If you think all this makes sense, you can get 51 helpful marketing ideas from Drayton. Just go to www.draytonbirdcommonsense.com and register. Then you can also download a free book of which the late David Ogilvy said “Nobody should have anything to do with the business of advertising until they have read this book at least seven times."
Keyboards - Roedelius* , Rother*
Hi Folks — My friend, who is a magazine editor, is already compiling her December gift guide (of course), and one of the many products that just crossed her desk is this: A backpack with a built-in car alarm! Just pull the string and the thing starts shrieking. “Because,” my friend noted, “nothings says ‘Happy Holidays’ quite like a school bag with a built-in car alarm.”
I read.
toast, one tbsp of reduced fat peanut butter, one tbsp of sugar free
Good and extensive, if generally too easy, racing game with cute cleavage-heavy asian CG babes and reference-quality surround sound implementation. Once the agreeable career mode is complete, however, the game becomes increasingly less desirable to play due to a misjduged lack of challenge (but not to a lack of content, this game would take ages to finish). That said, it’s nice to see a racing game with a decent entry level of difficulty. Too many racing games are too hard for many people even on Easy (if there is an Easy level, a lot of racing games don’t have selectable difficulty).
11/2/11---Day 2 of giving thanks: Praise & Worship Music! It helps get me back on track! :) Definitely thankful for Christian Music Radio, like K-Love and AFR!
Another plus for silicone is that whatever you’re buying can be made in
The airline industry are preparing to sue the pants off the Met Office following the non-existent ash clouds that grounded all aircraft across Europe earlier this year.
So this past weekend, in a borrowed truck and a borrowed flat-bed trailer, we made the trek to Chicago.
If you find serenity and happiness, some may be jealous. Be happy anyway.
Once again we had awesome entries into the sketch challenge and it was great to see everyones take on it. Well done Ang great sketch.
Story: Nkateko is a bit of a frustrating story, as all the work done to get this lovely leopard habituated to the presence of vehicles cannot even be enjoyed by our guests now, as Nkateko was pressurised out of the area and moved a relatively stupendous distance to the south to set herself up on a property used by Ngala Game Lodge. Starting at the beginning, Nkateko was a seldom seen cub for two reasons; firstly she did not want to be seen and secondly, her mom did not want her to be seen! Rockfig was extremely protective over the cub, and from a young age, Nkateko saw this reaction and immediately assumed that vehicles were bad news.
* investors in new products and services are more confident of seeing a return on their investors when free-riders are kept at bay for a reasonable period.All is good until the final bullet. What exactly is a “free rider”? Is it a counterfeiter who intentionally copies a trademarked article in order to deceive the public into believing it is other than a fake? Is it the person who sneaks a camcorder into a movie theatre to permit downloads of hit movies before even opening weekend has expired? Or is the term, in this context, referencing downstream suppliers and distributors who freely sell and resell genuine merchandise for which the “investor” has already received its reward? Is “free rider” an intentionally prejudicial term against wholesalers and distributors not bound to those marketing investments mandated by manufacturers luring “authorized” distributors to a selective supply chain in a world more and more dependent upon a borderless economy?At this point, I assume many readers have branded me a traitor and may have even already left the page to read a more reasonable article. So, what can I say to lure you back? I have been working with brand owners since before the Internet. I have worked with businesses for years and years to build strong, global IP portfolios. I could not be more opposed to or appalled at or about counterfeiting and blatant piracy. I agree that technological innovations have simplified copying, making appear right what has always been considered wrong. I also “get” that manufacturers have and should have the right to contractually and territorially restrict sales made by their “authorized” distributors. I am however angry when the rights holders file lawsuits not against their distributors for breach of contract as a result of unauthorized sales to third parties, but against these downstream purchasers. I am angry at the way rights holders manipulate courts and congress into believing that they are incredibly injured by purported “free riders” when they have been paid for the products and consumers depend upon the competition and access provided by downstream, discount retail outlets. I am angry that it is easier to pass legislation or for countries to enter into treaties potentially criminalizing lawful product resales, than it is for governments to insist that private businesses enforce their contracts. I am angry that the smallest of website operators are expected to know the IP laws of every jurisdiction in the world as the only means of avoiding lawsuits from powerful brand owners. I am angry that innovators are more eager to collect damages through litigation than they are to value technology as an advance to our society as a whole. And I am angry that because I am angry about these things my friend, IKat, may consider me morally deficient.JIPLP editorialized that the starting point for things going downhill was when IPR became subject to economic analysis: You can exclusively possess and control a painting, a plot of land, or a piece of pottery—but you cannot own a market for goods or services. So for the innovator who creates a market, the question was no longer ‘how can he keep what he has created?’ but ‘how can the market, once created, be competitive?’ Why, in the world, is this a bad thing? How can we, in the 21st century, believe that an obligation to ensure competition is the starting event for the “rot’ setting in?It is not ok to counterfeit. It is not ok to infringe. It is not ok to cheat at your taxes , rob a bank or deprive a man of his privacy. But it is just as not ok to lump parallel traders into a pile of morally deficient commoners without appreciation for law or private property. It is possible to believe in the value of IPR, while still believing that the goal of innovation is not to quash competition. It is possible to take the moral high ground by insisting that the bad guys who steal technology go to jail while, at the same time, defending the rights of purported “free riders” to ensure global access to critical, safe, authentic, branded merchandise --- even if such unfettered access provides unwanted competition to those incredibly moral technological “investors”.Thanks, Laura, for your viewpoint -- and for taking the trouble to let us share it. I concede that morality and the benefits of a competitive market are not inherently mutually exclusive, though once a debate on IP takes place on the basis of economic criteria it can be hard for moral issues to muscle their way in.
The program of events at Grey Fox starts this Thursday, but the faithful convene at the gates early Wednesday morning. While the line-up of acts at the festival is stellar, many of us find that first “unofficial” day to be the most fun. Everyone is still fresh and— as the video clip above shows— there’s plenty of fine pickin’ to be heard by just wandering among the campers.
2. Someone Else remakes things in Lego
In search of help, Marlin bumps into Dory, a naïve but good-hearted and optimistic Regal tang with short-term memory loss. While meeting self-declared vegetarian sharks Bruce, a great white shark; Anchor, a hammerhead shark; and Chum, a mako shark, Marlin discovers the diver’s mask that was dropped from the boat and notices an address written on it. However, he struggles with Dory and the mask snaps against Dory’s nose, causing a nosebleed. The scent of blood causes Bruce to lose control of himself, and he attempts to eat Marlin and Dory. Shortly after the two escape from Bruce, the mask is dropped into a trench in the deep sea. During a hazardous struggle with an anglerfish in the trench, Dory realizes she is able to read the address written on the mask, which leads to Sydney, Australia, and manages to remember it despite her short-term memory loss. After receiving directions from a large school of moonfish, Marlin and Dory set out to find Sydney. After a struggle with jellyfish that nearly sting Dory and him to death, Marlin is recovered by a surf-cultured sea turtle named Crush, who takes Dory and him on the East Australian Current. Marlin thinks Dory is dead and blames himself, but she makes a full recovery as well. In the current, Marlin reluctantly shares the details of his journey with a group of young sea turtles, and his story spreads rapidly across the ocean through word of mouth and eventually reaches Nemo in Sydney.
has a direct responsibility on the situation for the situation of
1 cent
I’m very nervous about the prospect of writing serial fiction, because I’ve never really done it before; or at least, certainly not to a set schedule, or with an overarching plot rather than a series of afterthoughts tacked on with increasing clumsiness. I’ve already harangued Lee Barnett (Week Ending for the BBC) and Kieron Gillen (Phonogram, Journey Into Mystery) about how best to divide up the plot and maintain a level of appropriate tension and release, and just about restrained myself from filling up the ask box on Neil Gaiman’s Tumblr with whiny entreaties for some kind of explanation as to how the hell one writes serially.
of humanity.
A musical selection as an aid to track the sound of the brain in the midst of un-cluttering:
7: I wanted a Mei Tai because I know from experience that they are really easy to get Nookie onto my back with by myself. And as that’s how I like to carry her now, and she prefers to be on my back so she can see what’s happening, I knew this was the sling for me this time. I did some research into the most supportive types, knowing the problems I’d had in the past, and settled on a Maya Wrap Mei Tai. It has straps that open out into a wrap, distributing the weight across your whole torso and avoiding the pressure on my boobs that I’ve had an issue with before.
7. bank bags
Milwaukee 2496-22 M12 Multi-Tool and Screwdriver Combo Kit Nite Ize LUC2-07 L.E.D. Combo Kit Upgrades AA Mini Mag-Lite from Incandescent to LED Technology with on/off switch Fluke 117/322 Electricians Multimeter and Clamp Meter Combo Kit Makita LCT302W 10.8-Volt Ultra Compact Lithium-Ion Cordless 3-Piece Combo Kit WORX WG913.51 3-Piece 18 Volt Lithium-Ion Cordless Combo Kit With Blower, String Trimmer & Hedge Trimmer Milwaukee 2207-21P M12 12V Cordless Fork Meter with 2410 Cordless Drill Combo Kit Makita LCT314W 12V Max Lithium-Ion Cordless 3-Piece Combo Kit (9 Items Combo) Tool Repair Kit Precision Screw Driver Set Torx + Flat Head + Safe Plying Prying Pry Tool for Motorola Bostitch CPACK300 3-Tool and Compressor Combo Kit Milwaukee 2696-24 M18 Cordless Compact Combo Tool Kit Dremel CKDR-01 3-Tool Combo Kit DEWALT DCK425CR 18V Compact Cordless 4-Tool Combo Kit Porter Cable PC3Pak Finish Nailer/Brad Nailer/Stapler Compressor Combo Kit Makita LCT400W 18-Volt Compact Lithium-Ion Cordless 4-Piece Combo Kit Milwaukee 2420-20 M12 Hackzall Recip Saw Bare Tool Bosch CLPK411-181 – 18V 4-Tool Kit, DDH181 – Drill/Driver and CRS180 – Reciprocating Saw & 25618 – Impact Driver & CFL180 – Lithium-Ion Flashlight Makita LXT311H 18-Volt LXT Cordless Lithium-Ion 3-Piece Combo Kit Porter-Cable PCL212IDC-2 12-Volt Max Compact Lithium-Ion 2-Tool Kit Bosch CLPK232-180 18V Cordless Lithium-Ion 2-Tool Combo Kit DEWALT DCK266L 18-Volt Lithium-Ion Compact 2-Tool Kit Factory-Reconditioned Skil 2860-10-RT 18V Cordless 3/8-in Drill Driver and Circular Saw Combo Kit Panasonic EYC105LR Cordless, Battery Powered, Rechargeable 14.4V Drill Driver / Impact Wrench Combo Kit Makita LCT212W 12-Volt max Lithium-Ion Cordless 2-Piece Combo Kit
Combine the following in a little bowl:
It took me less than 24 hours to recognize that artist in me that I have ignored for many years in exchange for earning an above minimum wage for the sake of my kids. I auditioned for a well known game show where I met a woman who turned out to be an artist and a blogger as well. We talked about a lot of things. Surprisingly our conversation made me forget that I have not slept for more than 20 hours and that my feet were already killing me. I even felt like a kid pouring my self into every story that I told her . I became to understand a lot of things about myself and why marriage did not work. In less than a day I had opened my heart to a stranger which does not happen everyday. With so many stories shared, she fearlessly told me to write again. I immediately expressed my hesitancy. I am not after all a writer and it had been more than twelve years. Without blinking , she added that as beginners, one does not write to have an audience. One writes to express who she really is.
CTAS includes most of the tribal programs from the department's Office of Justice Programs (OJP), Office of Community Oriented Policing Services (COPS) and the Office on Violence Against Women (OVW). The programs were listed as 10 purpose areas. In previous years, tribes seeking funding for more than one of these purposes would need to submit multiple grant applications. With CTAS, tribes were able to submit a single application while selecting multiple purpose areas, ranging from juvenile justice to violence against women.
(From Summer in Calcutta)
deplorable, it is wrong, and it is a violation of human decency as
Oreki Houtarou is a passive high schooler who isn’t interested in sports, socializing, or studying, but merely getting through school with a minimum of exertion. When his abroad sister makes him join the dying Classic Literature Club, he meets the extremely friendly and curious Chitanda Eru, who convinces Houtarou to stick with the club with her charms after solving two mysteries together, one real, one faked. Houtarou’s friend Fukube Satoshi also joins.
Welkom.
Lindsay Dyer: keep with my original philosophy and reason for designing stamps, make them fun and keep them sassy...and yes sometimes even sexy!
After boxing, I headed to yoga where I experienced my second moment of happiness. Donna had us lift our arms and do surrender breaths and whenever we do surrender breaths, we usually say “ha” at the end. Makes me smile every time.
I don’t give a damn what team you support. Let’s put this out there to begin with, before anyone accuses me of letting my support change my argument.
Mark was one of the founders of Click Industries, Ltd. an online company that provides products and services for small business owners, writers, musicians, and other artists. The company was sold in 2009.
English PEN is part of International PEN which campaigns for writers imprisoned by repressive regimes around the world. It’s Readers and Writers programme sends writers into schools and prisons. In the past three years they have developed a programme to support asylum seekers who want to write. I have been involved in this initiative since the onset and have run several workshops in Pimlico and the East End.
I was sent few items for review purpose few days back .. lets have a look at these babies .. !!
Paper recycling is old news, but it seems to be an on-and-off venture for most people. Making recycled paper crafts into a business provides fuel to the recycling machine. If you look at bookstore displays, you’ll find coarse looking stationery and specialty papers. Even if these look old and rough, they are more expensive than those smoother and printed papers. Those coarse specialty papers are handmade and use natural fibers and recycled paper. You don’t need to buy a truckload of waste paper to get started. In fact, look around your house. Sort through your old files and see if there’s anything in there that you don’t need anymore. White office paper like bond papers are great for this recycling project.
Clash By Night
“I forgot,” he admitted. Tilting his head back just enough to meet his captor’s gaze, he did a terrible job of hiding how happy he was to see the Pred. “Welcome back.”
I am still learning how much to warm her up before we go work. Seems if we lope and I sit and she stops right away she is ready to work if I have to help her stop she needs more loping. It's hard to know how much to do. Charlene's horse can probly be loped for hours before cause he gets so excited, but Jessie not as much but I don't know if too much would be bad for her either (as long as she isn't super tired)
No i wasn't asked to write this or given product by the company, its just me telling you about a product i won and thought others would kind of like to!
After he joined the U.S. Senate, he wrote another book based on his campaign and what he saw in Washington, The Audacity of Hope: Thoughts on Reclaiming the American Dream. It topped the New York Times best-seller list in the fall of 2006.
Observing the trend, he said that his group had decided it would examine reports of scrawled swastikas for contextual clues. If it appears Jews were not the target, the incident will not be included in the league’s annual audit of anti-Semitic hate crimes.
All I can promise you, is me, exactly the way that I am. You have me. You have me like no one has ever had me before, it is a vulnerability that I have never touched before and one that I manage everyday.
Finally, no developments on the plan to turn the big railway warehouse into houses and offices, while there's no start date for Kingsgate mall expansion.
Use a 1 tablespoon cookie scoop or rounded tablespoon to form 1-inch balls of cookie dough. The dough will be sticky so occasionally dust your hands lightly with gf powdered sugar to prevent sticking. Make about 36 balls of dough and place 1 1/2-inches apart on prepared baking sheets. Bake in preheated oven for 13-15 minutes or until cookies are firm but not hard.
Before she can even settle in, the whirring gears of the silo begin to grind anew. Things aren't right. And the people whose help she most needs are gone.
I adoringly sit next to my husband and listen attentively as he tells me statistics about baseball and the science behind broad-heads. My mind does not wander and I do not fall asleep as soon as my head hits the pillow. I have energy to talk with him about his day and laugh together. I am still sharp and witty. My makeup still looks as fresh as it did when I put it on and I don’t have the slightest urge to put on comfy pajamas.
Choxi by Prestat
And then she put her head down
After church, we went to the front desk to validate our parking pass. Problem? Daniel didn’t tell me that’s what I was stamping, so I stamped my National Park Passport instead. Oops. Thankfully, the dude in the parking lot took that as a valid stamp… well, he accepted it and let me keep the stamp in my book.
That will not sear
Let’s talk a bit about you Roger. What made you want to get into acting in the first place?
of the bad stuff
-organic cheese ravioli with tomato sauce
You may enjoy discovering facts about – Dante degli Alighieri…
But the To Hold component wipes the slate clean. As soon as we hold that infant in our arms, we've already--in our minds--ushered in the For Better part.
I had to leave before the paint was dry enough to add the hardware and put it back together. We also had fun playing with the kids, going to the beach, eating out, and just being together.
Happy Halloween
Bake until the center is set when you give the pan a gentle shake, 30-35 minutes. Remove from oven and using a small knife, loosten the warm cheesecake square form the sides of the pan. Let cool on a wire rack for 1 hour. Cover with plastic wrap and refrigerate until chilled, at least 3 hours or over night.
Without doubt, one glass of this would be not enough.
This is the current sketch that I was lucky enough to play with!
Inside Layer 3 3/4 x 3 3/4
The age of five seemed so far off at that point in time, twice her age away as a matter of fact! But as time passed, the inevitability of that number seemed to creep eerily closer. And, this past Saturday, that day finally became a reality.
Click on an image to start the slideshow.
AAFES fed this into my Facebook wall today for anyone interested in coupons to use at the Exchange!
"Oh, well the 'Sir' thing." He smiled with his faded brown eyes. "I was hoping Her majesty would knight me."
Before they start shouting out ideas about direction and when the force is present, I try to grab two matter models and help them start visualizing what it looks like for two objects pushing past one another. They see pretty quickly that the atoms are shearing (and also that they are getting crunched). So we pretty quickly come up with the idea that the friction force is present when atoms are being sheared. Even though “sheared” isn’t a word that they’re using in everyday speech, it is pretty easy for them to connect it to what the matter models look like when they are pushing past each other. Considering all of the other language problems, it might even be better that it isn’t a commonly used word (so long as they pick up the meaning and start using it right away).
Ok I'm sure you've all had an awkward moment where you felt like you just wanted to melt or you wanted out of that situation ASAP. Lately I have been feeling like the queen of awkward. Allow me to enumerate just a few instances.
Advocate Gumbi and I agreed that she (together with the legal unit in the presidency) would review all the legal issues related to the decision and advise how the government would handle the matter – a procedure dependent on the nature of the decision, which we would only hear officially from the delegation later that morning.
Apologies for the lack of updates over the last couple of weeks... Coming back to daily life from holidays always take a bit longer than you would like to :)
day long, and I was very tired.
Techs in the Government of Canada hold their breaths as round of layoff, after layoff. My only question is why the Harper Gov just hired another external company to manage cost savings, while paying this external company more per day then the average tech per year.
She switched off the glowing red lights around the house, the timer on the cooker panel and the flashing digits of the bed-side alarm. She stopped winding the old wooden clock on the sideboard. She searched for ways to add back the numbers. She favoured clothes with no buttons or fasteners, elasticated waists, slip on shoes. She gave up going to the hairdressers, grabbed back the minutes spent on plucking her eyebrows, painting her nails. She began to eat meals that needed no cooking, then food that needed no chewing. Her sentences got shorter, her words monosyllabic. She forced herself to stay up all night, snatching at the moments that had previously passed unnoticed in sleep, counting and reckoning all that had been, totting up all that might be left.
There is a new musical playing in San Francisco, a show based upon the "Tales of the City" novels by Armistead Maupin. The opening scene, set in 1976, introduces us to twenty five year old MaryAnn, from Cleveland Ohio who is seeking an apartment. She finds a home, and a group of friends at 28 Barbary lane on Russian Hill and the show tells the entwined stories of these fascinating people through some quite brilliant songs, including "Nobody's city but my own".
This was a fun image to work on and one that really stands out. You can look into a deeper meaning of this image if you like but it’s just something cool I found on a photo adventure. I hope this inspires you to get out and explore your surroundings.
I’m so proud of my husband. He was able to put aside any protective feelings for his daughter and guide her with the right advise, and I know that she will listen. Positive thoughts that tomorrow I will post about a positive outcome!
While speaking to this said stalker for the first time, I did get a bad vibe and was rather "weird-ed" out by many of the statements he made. However, I brushed it off because, well, he doesn't know me and there is indeed a block, and ban option on the site I broadcast on, both of which I undoubtedly made good use of. Nonetheless, irregardless of my efforts to rid myself of this person's presence, he has made it a daily, vigorous duty to not get the picture and find me on every messenger, and site that I regular on and send me message after message, after message, after message, after message to which of none of them did I respond to. Yet he continues. Thus, I decided to respond to one and simply say (and yes I simply said) "Do not contact me anymore.", because although I made good use of the block feature on the sites I regular, it had become pointless because he would create new profiles to contact me under.
2. Working out. I have this thing called a Fitness Flyer (although I always forget its name and refer to it as the "Flexible Flyer" which leads Atticus to tease me about going sledding) which I bought from the Magical Mrs. M. for $15. It's the best $15 I ever spent, though I didn't fully appreciate that until this past Lent, when I added 45-minute workouts to my life. In the past, I couldn't get beyond the 20-30 minute mark on the Flyer without some pain in my back. This Lent, I pushed through the pain and extended the workouts to 45 minutes, many more times per week, and I got beyond the pain-in-the-back. Who knew that actually strengthening those back muscles would do the trick?
"What are you doing?" Jared said. "Go with him."
And, Robert Browning, you writer of plays,
1 drop food coloring
Hard to believe that it’s March 1st! With the start of March, many of us are thinking of Spring travel. In fact, we were inspired to make some Spring Travel windows in our stores this month.
Dear LORD, thank You for teaching me the secret of supernatural success. I declare that I am excelling in every area of my life by Your Grace alone! I thank You for I know that as I meditate on Your Word, all that concerns me is perfected in Christ Jesus. Amen!
It hasn't always been this way.
It HAD to have been his mom. Who would make sure that the necessary food groups were covered and that a growing boy had enough food to fill his stomach with him when he left the house? It HAD to have been his mom.
Our TV is too nice to trust an old wood plank and some bricks we stole from “the quad”. DVDs just don’t fit in milk crates like albums did. I want furniture that an Amish guy had to hand build, not stuff I can still not put together correctly no matter how many Allen keys I have.
On the big day we will, Insha'Allah (God Willing), be in Amsterdam.... so forgive me if I don't get to comment till later in the week.... then we will be at NEC lol but I will get to comment I promise.
You know what? I don’t know why he was walking slowly; and actually, it doesn’t matter. At all. There’s no reason anyone should have to explain anything about Trayvon Martin’s behaviour that night. He wasn’t doing anything wrong. Walking slowly isn’t a crime in Florida, where the gated community is; nor is talking on a mobile phone; or carrying a bottle of iced tea and a bag of Skittles; or wearing a hoody; or wearing your hood up; or being young, black and male.
I like to serve this salad warm or at room temperature. I am hoping you might like to too...
34. The Last Shot -- Lou Reed
Ok, I admit it, I have been known to zone out right in the middle of a conversation. The lights are on, but sometimes I’m not home. I’ve gone to Bermuda. You see, way, way back in the day, a bunch of us were out at the Universal Amphitheater watching two great acts – The Blues Brothers (as the opening act) and Steve Martin, wearing his trademark white suite and head arrow, doing his brilliant stand up routine. Every now and then, Steve would stop in the middle of his monologue and stare off into space then snap back saying “Oops, I just went to Bermuda”. I have no idea why that idea left such an indelible impression on me, but that phrase has been well used in our family ever since and frankly, I find myself going there more and more often.
Faith allows us to see a small glimpse of the front side of God’s tapestry of life even as we live among the tangles and knots behind the scenes, and to trust that God knows what is best.
So an MMO for the WiiU is that possible? (Read prior article). Yes it is and where is this MMO coming from? None other then UbiSoft Quebec a publisher built from the ground up to support PSP and Wii. The publisher in the past has handled several ports and spin offs. But in recent years they have been working closely with UbiSoft Montreal the flagship and crown jewel of UbiSoft.
Today, it is my birthday! I am not planning to do anything special. I am going for manicure and pedicure in the afternoon and spending the day with my husband and son! We will be celebrating over the weekend with friends: dinner on Saturday night and brunch with my girlfriends on Sunday!
Grandma Got Run Over By a Reindeer ... Cartoon Network (east) ... 10:30 AM
social media sites dom­inate Internet usage by businesses. According to the company, employees watching YouTube videos accounted for 10 percent of
During the 2005 season with no tyre changes teams had the mechanics with back pack mounted nitrogen cylinders, as the car stopped for refuelling, the mechanics would rapidly alter the tyre pressures to change the balance of the car.
Cheri what did you wish for??
Text: 5 out of 5
Anyway--maybe these pictures can help us get to know the beams better...
Just as our dogs stayed, faithfully waiting for their masters to come and provide their needs, so should we wait and trust in God. Oh, there was rejoicing when we got home. They bounced and leaped, excited to see us, and we loved them intensely back. I ran and got food for them and even had to encourage them to eat for they, despite being desperately hungry, were more interested in crawling in my lap and being close. There is a lesson in this for me. Just as they trust in us, to the point perhaps of starving, so need I to trust in God, to truly believe He will take care of us and knows our needs even before we do. When things get bad, when situations all seem to go wrong, when church people who are supposed to love and care reject and gossip instead of doing what they know is right, I need to understand that God is still God. That He loves us even more than we love those dogs and will always lift us up. We pray every day for the pastor and others at Hosanna, intercede for them, ask God to be merciful but also ask that He help them see and understand how their actions directly contradict everything our faith is about. We are to lift up, not tear down, strengthen, not destroy.
It is also not that silly given we already know that the app will require a re-login if you change to a previously unused IP address. So if the backend tracks a Login+IP relationship, then it is not silly to consider other checks that add only a small unseen overhead for legit use, but make flooded brute force attacks difficult.
Day after day they pour forth
It’s easy to destroy – It takes effort to create.
Zaragoza Grill, La Posada Hotel
After a tasty dinner, we brought out her birthday cupcake (or fairy cake as the girls like to say). We sang “happy birthday,” she blurted out her wish and then made a couple of attempts at blowing out the candle before being successful.
To his mind people should continue to wed according to the tribal patter. Which was: that Tullam should marry Mungara, Mungara should wed Garri, Garri should wed Wibbera, Wibbera take Tullam’s women. But here was Jimmie, a Tullam, married in church to a white girl.
Found out that Ron's chair can't be fixed. That sucks big time. We don't really have the money to replace the chair. So, he's having some difficulty getting out of the regular recliners. I ended up bringing the Jazzy back into the living room so he could sit in it some. So, we're back to square one on trying to find a lift chair for Ron.
I am still asked if this is for certain the last baby. Even by people that know Hub had a vasectomy. Yes, it is! 100% it is. It has been 5 months since hub had it done, and I am more happy and content with the decision as time goes by.
Hearts are kind of like snowflakes- no two are the same. Or at least, I can't seem to find two that are the same in any of my crafty stuff. It's funny how one shape can have so many variations.
Floor upon floor and row upon row and shelves upon shelves, The Strand felt extremely maze-like and claustrophobic. Tara warned me about the sensory overload, but I didn't really know what to expect until we got there. It's like the anti-Housing Works - where the Housing Works makes you feel ok about browsing and lingering, The Strand makes you feel anxious and rushed. So many people and so little space, but so many floors and such incredibly tall bookshelves. *i'm feeling a little panicky just thinking about it.* I totally get why, I mean, it's the best known bookshop in the city!
Off to finish watching csi, thanks for stopping by x
The litter in your neighborhood consists of condoms, panties, syringes, and glass pipes.
Second bike (timer didn’t work for a few minutes at the start and they added distance to make up for it): 13
THE HORRORS - WILD EYED
I came to this play for the rumors of the disco ball and the gefilte fish and ended up sitting with a room full of people, many older male couples, who were all blinking away tears.
Fra Newbery was one of the town’s best known artists who painted the beautiful Spirit of Bridport. He strove ‘to make art more readily available to a wider public, attempting to relate it to their daily lives and to celebrate the traditions of the specific localities in which the works were sited’. (And, ironically, on the day I write this, the Fra Newbery website is just about to be taken down for a lack of funding).
03 eye of a needle
im joining in.
I know this. I deserve someone who will take me out and WANT to be seen with me. Someone who's hand I can hold ANYWHERE.
Not until I'm ready to hear it.
Thanks to everyone that entered last week's "Tags and Wrapping" Challenge.
That being said I am going to try to keep the posts going and I'm sure I will be better at it once the wedding is over. For now this is a very nice stress relieveing break for me so I hope you like what I've found.
Show off your best Freestyle-inspired jump on the famous Barton Springs diving board on Saturday, July 7th. Check in and register near the entrance to Barton Springs Pool from 7:00-8:15 am, and the contest begins at 8:30 am. Registration is $25 and all proceeds go to Austin Parks Foundation. You must be at least 18 years old and able to swim to enter the jump contest. Jumps will be judged on showmanship and freestyle-inspired creativity. There will be an awards party with prize giveaways and BBQ at the brewery from 12 noon to 2pm.
The week of the photo shoot arrived and so did Spring! The weather was beautiful and great for a photo shoot so I carefully selected outfits for everyone to wear. Then I heard the weather forecast for that Saturday: High's in the mid to upper 40's and windy! UGH! I definitely wanted everyone dressed in "springy" colors but the outfits I had chosen earlier just weren't going to work for the weather that day so I had to go out and get some things at the last minute. As you will see, I think they turned out really cute considering!
Extraordinary bosses see their company as a collection of individual hopes and dreams, all connected to a higher purpose. They inspire employees to dedicate themselves to the success of their peers and therefore to the community–and company–at large.
It is amazing to have someone believe in you. That's one of the reasons I try to freely let people know how important they are to me. It's one tiny way I can contribute.
tanguera: "i can feel your energy now. back then, you felt like a shell, as if you were afraid to be in your body."
27) RIGOR MORTIS – The Gravestone Four
So I know we're a day behind, but here's the final installment of this season's Freebie Fridays. This installment is a little contest for all of our loyal followers as well for all fans of Halloween. The first batch of Highbury Cemetery 2011 t-shirts are done and we're giving one away to one lucky person for absolutely completely 100% free. Our Halloween gift to you!
Sarah #32
Catherine Tate, laugh.
A Trio of Ascensions… But not one of these incredible beings has a book attributed to them as core to the Bible.
It was handy in some ways, not so much in others. For example, one of the tasks hanging over me on the flight to San Diego was to crunch numbers to calculate the surface area of the rooms in our new house so I'd know how much paint we'll need for the walls and ceiling. I was able to pop open my Xoom to complete this. However, later, when I went to enter my data into a Google Docs spreadsheet, I realized it was too cumbersome to achieve without a keyboard (which I may purchase).
"Spend everyday casual, but industrious; Every moment alert, but relaxed."
and I'm officially on holiday yeahhhhhhhhh although my to do lists are still quite large and Im wanting to get through them as quick as possible. I had a lovely visit off my eldest daughter and grand daughter on Friday so little time but it was lovely to see them. and then a visit from my other daughter what a day I was a lucky lady and a lucky mom to have such fabulous kids.
Isaiah 13:18 Their bows will strike down the young men; they will have no mercy on infants nor will they look with compassion on children.
A diamond in the ROUGH for sure....
Check it out, before:
7. It Keeps You Runnin'– 4:20
"...Each man's death diminishes me,
We’ve all been taught the lesson from the time we were children: wild animals are not pets. Don’t feed the bears, don’t adopt a panther (as much as you think they’re beautiful, those coal-black creatures of grace and lethality), don’t fool yourself into thinking that hippo is happy to see you. I haven’t had much experience with wild animals but the few times our lives have intertwined were, for the most part, normal. For the most part, you say?
But with the brightness comes the pain
1. I'm going to BEA in NYC next month! AND I'll be signing copies of Elemental at the Spencer Hill Press booth (#4447) from 10:00-11:00am on June 6th!
For Loreus wields the Golden Sword of Purity, a weapon forged long ago
Baden-Baden (or just Baden as it used to be known) is a quiet and peaceful spa town lying on the western flank of Germany's Black Forest. In fact the word Baden means baths in German and its origins as a spa town dates back to Roman times, when the Emperor Caracalla used to visit and take his ease in the imperial baths. Nowhere is this fact more striking than in seeing these antique roman bath jars suspended high above the ground where they were found.
So here is the Lady behind all the tulle and ribbons:
Mystique
You see, of all the nursery school moms, I am one of two that works.
(sent separately in email)
of lampwork glass, hematite, crystals, quartz and more
We are planning for the next one in September!
Paula. x
Here is a shot of one of the interiors of the camera; I glued the eye down and then glazed over it so that it appears to be part of the piece and not just sitting on top of the paint.
“We should not be in a race to the bottom where we take pride in having the cheapest labor and the most polluted air and the least protected consumers,” he said.
Here’s the final result:
Yellow: Frozen (thawed) pineapple
I grabbed a handful of Tintin comics and every Disney book I saw. There were a lot of famous Japanese characters mixed in too. It was real work to find some actual Chinese-specific character comics. I got a few but the pickin's were slim. I don't think Chinese illustrators draw many comics; I think they spend their time drawing wall art.
We took TONS of shots of Sami...It's kind of hard to Not do the edits...I think this is my favorite so far though. She's got one of those "sassy" personalities and I think it comes through...
It feels very much like an addiction: illogical, dangerous, destructive and yet something towards which he is irresistibly drawn.
But 25-year-old Bolt has come in for criticism from fellow black Jamaicans unhappy that he has chosen a white partner.
Haas’ “In iij. Noct.” is composed as a verbal score, with many details and decisions left to the performers. The duration of the piece is only decided during the performance. Haas has set out eighteen musical “situations,” with detailed instructions for improvising on pre-set motifs, chords and string textures, and a corresponding series of “invitations,” whereby the players signal one another that they are ready to proceed from one passage to the next.
I greatly enjoyed this excellent wine, but I would age this a little longer, just to soften out the tightness. If you love Claret, but want a little bit more value for money then some of this might be a great addition to any cellar – 91/100 points.
I finished these up a few days ago, but this post was delayed thanks to the little matter of an October snowstorm. Who would believe that the day before Halloween I would be clearing about a foot of heavy, wet snow off my car, after a storm that took out power, heat, everything? Including a tree I loved ... here's the birch tree in my backyard just after the first flakes began falling:
The Hallmark Channel is owned and operated by Crown Media Holdings, Inc.
In other words, though Tolkien finished The Fall of Gondolin before it, and the tale of Beren and Lúthien supplanted it as the heart of Tolkien’s account of the First Age of Middle-earth, The Children of Húrin was the seed of Tolkien’s entire legendarium.
Just how independent is the PLCB? Who exercises oversight on this agency? It's not the governor, clearly, as his "opinion" doesn't count for spit. Is it the Legislature? Don't know, although Conti and Stapleton were quick to dump most of the criticism of the PLCB's practices in their laps, as being responsible for The Almighty Liquor Code.
In the meantime, I'm trying to make the best of it all. And remembering some of the fine people I work with.
This weekend didn't exactly go down how I had envisioned it was going to. Of course it didn't help that before the weekend even got started two of us fell victim to strep throat, one of us to a nasty cold and the other, well he's skated through this whole time bug free. Which is nice considering it was his 9th birthday this weekend.
This one-month Wakeboarding experience is organized by The Board Shop, a Singapore-based company selling premium wake gear shop in Southeast Asia in coordination with the local government unit of Getafe, Bohol.
In one of the sittings, Kumar Mangat who owns Wide Frame Pictures and screenplay writer Robin Bhatt claimed that the similarities between the book and the film were mere coincidences and that the film was inspired by the late Sharad Joshi’s family and has been taken from there. They also accused Aabid Surti of filing the complaint only for publicity.
Come and park your car here. Never a traffic warden in sight. Must be special dispensation? Personally I couldn’t care less if someone parks on these double yellows. But if they can, can I?
So yeah, it’s been forever since I’ve updated this thing. However, I must say; my life at this juncture is pretty damn boring! Can you imagine that? I work, I watch How I Met Your Mother and The Walking Dead, and I work out. That’s about it. There’s the occasional something else, venturing to the city, jiu jitsu happenings, but they come and go so fast, I suppose I never get to express my thoughts and feelings about that stuff…it’s all like a poof of smoke.
Within two days of the original symptoms being shown, patients and doctors alike started to notice even more staggering changes. Their skin began to turn pale and fragile, almost as if they were suffering from gangrene. Their eyes jaundiced and they lost the ability to speak. Doctors thought that meningitis may had been attacking the brain, but CT scans showed no signs of it. However, there were other, more interesting anomalies happening to the brains of the patients. Brain activity had slowed down significantly and short, measured electrical impulses were detected.
I'm struggling to finish up my last week at work, wrap up Christmas shopping and baking, balance social commitments, get ready for Baby 2.0, all the while trying to peacefully meditate on Jesus' arrival. But this Christmas is not about our baby.
I loved this mirror, but I had already bought two mirrors by the time I saw this one and it was right around the time the tornado siren went off, which left me a bit distracted. I kind of regret not buying it now.
In fact, the greatest success in my life has nothing to do with my family, work or church. It has nothing to do with my hobbies, dreams or desires. The greatest success in my life doesn’t even do with something that I accomplished. The greatest success in my life has everything to do with me doing nothing. I make you a bet you’re confused now.
"With the exception of some sessions accompanying other singers, the complete Will Ezell is on this single CD. A talented blues and boogie-woogie pianist, Ezell led four mostly instrumental solo sessions (resulting in 12 performances). In addition, his dates backing singers Marie Bradley, Ora Brown, Bertha Henderson, and Slim Tarpley are also included on this enjoyable and historic CD. Among the more rewarding selections are "Barrel House Man," "Mixed Up Rag," "Heifer Dust," "Playing the Dozen," and "Pitchin' Boogie.""
Brasilia, Brazil
What the publishers hate is that they’re not seeing a dime of that money. Not one dime. That is entirely their fault. All I want to do is be able to enjoy my entertainment. I do the same with movies and music. Whatever the cheapest way for me to get it, that’s the way I go. It’s all about the financial bottom line. I only have so much to spend on entertainment and I’ll maximize that money. Why spend $60 on one when I can spend $60 on three or four?
and really worst of all i think, our "normal" kid cj has really turned on them both. though that started long before we left. formerly loving, kind, giving, he's just a mean, hateful, selfish, little brat, all the time. we've dug into that too and he's very resentful of the "special" attention the other two have gotten, because they're broken. like going to therapy is fun?! he feels like we love them more and they don't get in trouble as much (course they feel the same!) but i hate the him vs. them feeling. it's awful. and no matter how much time with him, special privileges, time with daddy, he just doesn't ease up. he's super selfish and is always manipulating or bullying them. and when i talk to him, he does this sad baby act that oozes with selfishness. it breaks my heart because i can just see mean in his heart, not sadness like he's acting. i can see through it and it's just ugly. i'm scared it won't go away.
I was out late last Friday night. Partying and pigging out on fries with some new people I had just met at a bar. It was a typical beer, pool table, and small talk kind of a night. Except for one thing, the old couple in the center of the hall dancing to Hot In Herre by Nelly. Why they were playing this song? I don’t know. Why this couple decided it was there jam? I don’t know their backstory.
Goal #3 ~ Didn't do much with actual outlining of my MG series or my next YA novel, but my brain was on fire with plotting. So there's a bit of progress there. YAY!
The other day I was listening to some nurses talk about patients having to go back to surgery because of excessive bleeding. "Yeah, sometimes they have a prolene deficiency, hypoprolenemia," said one to gales of laughter. I didn't so much get it. Later I discreetly asked my preceptor what I was missing. Prolene is a kind of suture material the cardiovascular surgeons use. Now that is funny.
“As you can imagine having the technology to develop this vast energy resource will lead to a number of important socioeconomic benefits including the creation of jobs, increases in wealth and increases in tax and royalty payments for federal and state governments,” she said.
My hypothesis is that the networks’ focus on terrorism and religious extremism will decrease while portrayals of Arabs as victims or targets of violence from other Arabs may stay the same.
We like to use a glaze as a beautiful finishing touch to the ornament. Sculpy makes a shiny and matte finish glaze, or you can also use mod podge or a epoxy resin.
“Let me dig!” Emily grabbed the oar and continued the excavation. Clods of dirt tumbled down the steep side of the bank and into the water. I resumed my search for mysterious strangers, half expecting one to tumble out of the trees and right into our boat. A crow cried out overhead and once again, I nearly dropped the binoculars into the pond.
I'm home right now sick with a bad case of food poisoning. Spent last night throwing up in a bucket next to my bed every 20 minutes or so because I was too weak to walk to the bathroom and definitely too weak to drive myself to the clinic. I NEVER FELT MORE ALONE!!
My medicine bag is where I keep my mojo, it’s my very own Popeye’s spinach. Everyone should have their own medicine bag for that little bit of extra needed strength. If you don’t have one, in order to help you think about putting one together, I thought I’d show you the contents of mine.
So it goes.
Preheat the oven to 350°F. Line an 9 by 9-inch pan with parchment paper. Lightly coat the parchment paper with a non-stick spray.
So take time each day to just sit and feel. Be aware of the changes happening within you and all around you. Welcome in the new energy. Welcome the Love and the Light onto our planet, into your life, into your mind, body and soul – let it heal you and transform you. Feel your way to an expanded awareness, beyond your senses. Be open to new sensations, new experiences, new ways of thinking and being.
The next day was the race itself, and afterwards there was actually an interesting edible…
Thank you to my ten super kids for helping me learn to love without counting the cost and for helping me to understand that I'm really not the one in charge of you. (Shhhh...don't read this to your younger siblings). You are masters of your own destiny and I love seeing what you're becoming. God has great things planned for each of you. Never forget that you are special; planned from all eternity to play an important role in this great drama we call life. Reach for the stars, but keep your feet firmly planted on the earth.
cayenne pepper, pinch
illusion of separations keep the bees busy
But we can’t even have that conversation if people feel as if we don’t have our fiscal house in order. So the idea here is let’s act now. Let’s get this problem off the table. And then with some firm footing, with a solid fiscal situation, we will then be in a position to make the kind of investments that I think are going to be necessary to win the future.
In close and critical A/B examination of these 8.5 x 11 prints, using the exact same source photos and printer settings I actually cannot distinguish between the Epson original ink and this non-OEM ink.
4. The five pounds she had recently managed to lose (although she had probably gained at least two of those pounds back since, this morning, she ate an extra helping of the above-mentioned French Toast)
Seating areas complete with tea and coffee tables have adorned parlors and living rooms alike since the Victorian era. Imperial Furniture’s coffee tables of the 1920s are reminiscent of their modern counterparts. Demand for coffee surpassed that for tea in the United States during this period, and the European tea table became known as the American coffee table. The 1930s saw the repeal of Prohibition and the growing popularity of cocktails in need of a serving surface.
I have a love affair with Valentine’s Day.
We enjoyed ourselves so much we've decided on doing another cinema visit tomorrow (Easter Monday) and we've booked to see Mirror Mirror. I just hope my rather delicate digestive system can cope with a second input of unnutritious food and drink in such a short space of time.
The sale will last from today until Sunday, March 18th. I also wanted to make a fun freebie using Ker-Plunk! It's a homphone matching game. Click on it's picture to download yours today.
Peter Schiff: Yes, it is much more realistic that a gold standard comes back, than that we stay on the fiat standard we have now. It doesn’t work. It will collapse.
I think the chopstick idea is so cute. My Mr. and I used them at our wedding. We tied them with a ribbon and a tag with our initials. The tag said, "We work better as a pair" Get it? Because chopsticks AND married people do work better as a pair! It was cute. Everyone said so.
Yesterday David and I spent a few hours out and about enjoying the beautiful day after my hospital trip. It was pure joy to spend the day with my hunny bunny. (he rolls his eyes every time he hears that I call him that on my blog. tee hee!) Nothing spectacular happened - lunch out and a trip to our fave antique mall, but just spending the day with someone you love with all your heart & soul can bring joy in the most amazing ways. We finally had a chance to really talk about all that is going on in our lives. and as all of you know, communication is crucial in ANY relationship.
Menacing, macabre versions of peg dolls with broad, blank faces.
She clocked out at 9am two hours past the end of shift. Dead tired and with a nagging headache Judy shuffled her way to the elevator. She usually liked to take the stairs but couldn’t work up the energy to lift her feet that high. Squeezing into the square box bumping a few people she jockeyed for space. The headache tapped at her eyeballs just enough to make her wish she had taken something for it.
Regardless of that, you can't deny that Ms. Bondage is as fetching as ever:
The lowest shelf is canned goods. I found some risers at Target and they work great - now I can see everything. Next to the risers is our supply of Costco tomato bisque soup. Have ya'll had this stuff? I don't recommend you try it unless you never want to be able to eat another brand of tomato soup ever again. It's that good.
BYE FOR NOW!!! I’ve come to the conclusion that I need a little break from blogging to focus on other stuff. My life is a mess right now and I think I need all the epiphanies I can get for myself. I won’t be closing this blog. It’s become such a big part of me that to shut it down would be like cutting off an appendage. Anyway, I don’t know how long I’ll be gone. Maybe it’ll take a day, maybe a few weeks or maybe a year. I don’t really know. One thing’s for sure, I will be back and I’ll have a lot more buoys to share with you then. ■
The lollipop rosette was made using the Lace Ribbon Border, Boho Blossoms punch and a Fire rhinestone brad.
or frailty’s deep comprehension?
1) Thank and link back to the one who thought of you
I’m don’t know how I feel about the water cycle page. It could be better…or different…or…something. I’m not sure. I just knew I wanted to use it with my own son, so I included it. The water cycle page also helped to tie in the Bible verse that I chose to go along with this unit.
The person who originally commented replied with belligerent, ignorant responses mimicking how he believed “ghetto” people talked: “Well ain’t dat some sheeeiiittttt” or “Run and tell dat.” Seriously? Someone using the term “baby daddy” makes you respond with hateful, bigoted banter because you feel the term makes people sound ignorant?
The diagnosis is based on the clinical appearance and on the history of frequent exposure to soap, water, or other solvents. Irritant contact dermatitis is an occupational hazard for mothers, housewives, waitresses, bartenders, and those in the health professions. A second type of irritant contact dermatitis occurs because of moisture retention and maceration under wide rings. Thus, eczematous changes around rings may be either allergic or irritant in etiology. Patch testing to metals may be necessary to differentiate between these two possibilities.
of salt if desired.
11 - Edge Of Sundown 04:24
What a snob she must be. Goin’ and getting’ one of them highfalutin’ college degrees. I am usually a fan of women working if they choose to…however clearly Mrs. Santorum did not stay at home enough and beat common sense into her dipshit son. Shame on her. Well I’m just glad he’s stopped talking about how much he admires his communist grandfather.
Government teacher, Jeremy Truelove, states that, “Women’s rights are becoming better, but are definitely not equal.”
I started to get a few votes here and there, and then things started to go better and better. Better than I could have ever hoped for to be honest. If you look on the website under highest rated articles, I am currently at the top.
While Trevor has been stressed with studying for Finals, I have been struggling with being alone all the time (which I better get used to, because Trevor will be leaving more for a month and a half this summer for an internship in Arizona!) I drop Trevor off at 8:30 every morning, I then go to work, I come home around 5:30, go to the gym, come home, eat dinner by myself, clean, etc. etc. Then around 10:00 P.M. I drive over the Law School to pick up Trevor, who has been at the Law School ALL DAY LONG. He usually has already eaten dinner by himself at the Law Library. He might grab a little something more to snack on, then plops himself on the couch and studies some more. If we are lucky, we will watch a show or something together for half an hour--keeping us up way later then we want to be up, but we just want some time together. So we wake up and start that routine again, but of course, extremely tired on top of it.
But since we’re on our way down
Julius Malema was found guilty of provoking divisions within the ruling party and of bringing the organisation into disrepute on Thursday.
The whole enchilada…
The Best Headphones With Noise Canceling Feature
- Hearing defects
Julian, whose Lagomar surgery is situated in the El Raso urbanisation, says that the food you buy in supermarkets has a low percentage of meat and more amounts of cereals inside it. This, he says, is not good for the dogs’ digestive system.
If you are able to attend you’ll definitely be in for a treat in addition to being able to see work by the world’s leading artist you are encouraged to participate in a program of debates,panel discussions and keynote lectures. These will all take place in a bespoke temporary structure designed by New York based SO-IL architects which overlooks the east river from Randall’s Island Park, Manhattan.
Growing Gray - a pale gray taken from the wall - 239.234.230
“Is anyone among you sick? He should summon the presbyters of the church, and they should pray over him and anoint (him) with oil in the name of the Lord, and the prayer of faith will save the sick person, and the Lord will raise him up. If he has committed any sins, he will be forgiven.” (James 5:14-15)
We talked, we listened; we laughed, we cried; we worked, we played. We were each other's elemental need.
j: its hard traveling alot and constantly missing people. oh and living out of a suitcase!
Today we are focusing on the third chakra, the solar plexus chakra. Sometimes I have trouble following a challenge, either it takes too much time and I just can't fit it into EVERY day, or it is too complex, requiring too much preparation. But this challenge is proving to be really easy. It fits into my morning meditation nicely, and the good thing about meditation is all you have to do is "sit". I love that phrase "Don't just do something....sit there." So opposite of how we, as a society, are programmed. Refreshing.
vegan caviar
It was hoped that von Neumann would be of further government use with his new body, but they found that, like reincanation, the soul would lose memory of its prior self once in a new body. Howver, Kettler did exhibit some talents despite his lack of a formal degree and training, and he went into military defense research and analysis. He worked heavily on the cloning research done at the Univ of Calif San Diego, later Camp David, and Montauk’s Project Looking Glass. After some rather nasty incidents when things went wrong during the reverse engineering attempts on an ancient Vimana vessel found in Turkey, killing a dozen scientists, Kettler’s mind was wiped, different memories of dull defense research were put in…an unfortunate side effect was that Kettler began hearing voices in his head.
Loved this photo of Skipper in our garden in Nottingham. She loved sitting on that bench looking at all the wildlife on the canal. The swans did not take kindly to her at times.:)
It was much better than the days of consuming mainstream parenting media, and trying to create a peaceful and happy life with that....
That is until I tried to leave the store.
Playing with your hair, fiddling with pens, or tapping your fingers are all signs of nervousness and will also end up making your interviewers feel uncomfortable too. Instead, sit straight, keep your hands below your elbows and rest them somewhere comfortable so that all that your interviewer is paying attention to is what you are saying.
Booties
I use very few big words, i promise. Unless you consider 'wallpaper' a big word.
When 18-year old seniors in high school are selecting colleges, they look for something to draw them in. Some may go to Kentucky to support a national powerhouse in basketball. Some may go to Penn State for its remarkable journalism program. Others may go to University of Nevada – Las Vegas to have access to the casinos when they are 21. Many chose Monmouth for days like Monday, and having access to the beach.
Every time you spend time to pray, you’re actually putting
Still, there’s another dimension to binary thinking that has to be discussed in this context, one that reaches right down to the roots of what this blog and the peak oil blogosphere generally are trying to do. We’ll talk about that next week.
He's not respected by law enforcement. Remember Cambridge?
Christmas 2019, that is.
This is me, hitting the Reset Button.
Then, Tony Banks’ keyboard would sound, just like this:
@ephk
I am driving the car, which means I am in control.
Out of the dark they carry my heart
Some people reported seeing a brilliant light streak across the sky at the same time. Sightings occurred over roughly a 600-mile line across the two states, including Reno, Elko and North Las Vegas in Nevada, and the San Francisco, Sacramento and Bakersfield areas in California.
Tuesday, October 30th–Today was the one year anniversary of Fred’s death. I watched “Love On The Run.”
As that’s about all I can muster on this dreary Tuesday morning, you’ll have to make do with this Baltic badboy…
"Mum?"
Writer: Jared Romero
We have been discovering some delicious raw delights during this current detox/cleanse. This was adapted from a recipe at The Raw Gourmet. I'm a big fan of anything sunflower seedy, and this paté has a very smooth richness that makes for a tasty, filling spread or dip.
Your Children Left Their Spider on the Porch
Don't have much info on Nerves. They play quite fast HC with a strong punk influence. It's not thrash though.
Today, I am discouraged.
Back at the south Rim of the Grand Canyon at 4am on April 14, 2012, at least 4 inches of snow had fallen. We all met at the South Kaibab trail head soon after to start the journey. I was a bit surprised and very impressed that despite the snowstorm, we were heading into the dark, snowy abyss of the canyon. Rob and I planned to only go the Colorado River and back up the Bright Angel trail as the others ran from the south rim to the north rim and back to the south rim.
4. Lastly, top it all off with scallions and enjoy!
In fact the whole production had an Acorn Antiques look about it: the ad-libs, the 'not sure where I'm meant to be' dithering, the whispered prompts. Of course, this just added to the sheer fun of the show. And what a bloody good show it was: great energy, lots of silliness, proper choreographed dances and some excellent contemporary song choices the kids loved.
If you are still looking for that last minute gift for a special friend at church then we suggest you check out the launch of www.sonfishgear.com, an online Christian apparel and accessory store.
God blesses those who work for peace,
I am in NO WAY diminishing what Peach is going through, but every time we visit the clinic or the hospital, we see families with much harder rows to hoe. Some have little hope for recovery or they have life-long, life-altering effects and disabilities to manage. Many have few resources and no support outside of their treatment team, and just to get their child to appointments is a monumental feat. These families are fighting just as hard as we are, even with the deck stacked against them in one way or another, because what else can they do? No one will ever care for their child as much and as well as they do, and somewhere inside, they know that, and so they press on. And on and on. It's inspiring and gut-wrenching at the same time.
Wearing a short black lace dress by Michelle Cole, of COLEFACTS, Cameron gained the approval and cheers of this convergence of designers, stylists, media, other models in attendance and fans alike.
Have you ever moved or considered moving abroad to pursue a career–or even a significant other? What was the experience like? Do you have any suggestions, advice, or words of wisdom to share?
the mood of everyone within
"Folks we don't know what we're dealing with here but it's rapid and could be contagious. You need to get out of here and fast" as he reaches for his own mask and Hazmat suit. If he was a gambling man, he'd bet his last 50 bucks that this is a virulent contagion beyond anything he's seen before and he ain't taking any chances.
There may be many more unconfirmed cities who will also have protests – to see a larger (and somewhat out-of-date) collection of cities and info, view the Big List at GlobalCannabisMarch.com.
Dear Mr Puddlecote
38. Visit another city
artfulwings@live.co.uk
I actually have an obsession with saint charms and statues, which I think that you know, so when we got in this perfectly aged statue of Mary I just wanted to keep it! The blue touches on her robes are perfect and she has this adorable, non-creepy face. (We have an Infant of Prague statue whose eyes bother me.)
I wasn’t expecting to have much of an experience, to be honest. But everything was so magical to begin with, what with the huge, bright, beautiful moon, the mist, the darkness, the almost total absence of any other people in the park. It was so cold, but I didn’t even notice. (Until I got home, that is…) As soon as we dropped between the worlds I was dancing, laughing, running, playing with the fae. It marked the second most significant faery experience I have ever had.
But we were still the favorites. We battled into good standing and won home ice advantage. We were up against the Philadelphia Flyers during the first playoff game, who we've successfully beaten in the past. We had a good lead at 3-1. Then, we blew it. 4-3 in the Flyers favor.
Dan: I don’t feel eighty. I was a little upset awhile ago thinking about the number but I don’t feel it.
The narrative is accompanied by 28 pencil and watercolour illustrations (plus the cover) by Alan Marks. His drawings are fluidic and the colour palette appropriately dark. Although some of the drawings are a bit hasty, almost unfinished they convey well the feeling of urgency that the tempo of the narrative by Mary Sebag-Montefiore suggests. Special attention should be paid to the presence of the moor landscape in some of the illustrations and/or the cloudy skies featured prominently displaying restlessness and forebodings of doom.
iDubba now caters to all of English and Hindi TV channels in India with 150+ channels and 16000+ shows and movies in its database.
After descending several rungs, Nikki slips. She regains her balance before falling, but then the rung snaps off in her hand, and Nikki drops into the water. Hal starts freaking out and calling her name, but she seems fine...until Arch's severed head bobs up next to her in the water. Hal tries to rescue her by climbing into the well with Nikki, who finds another body, a female. Hmmm, I don't remember any of the women disappearing yet. Strange...
I have prepared myself for a time such as this. I have completed the basics and ready to move forward in my progression. I give thanks daily during my still time, alone with God. As I meditate on the wonders of life I know and accept my dreams are part of the overall picture of existence. It is my work to do and no one can do it but me.
5 child
So my suggestion to all of the American sprinters out there that aspire to greatness is, find yourself a partner or two and the best coach you can, and just as Maurice Greene once did BEG him to make a champion out of you – because it WORKS! Yes, you may have to go half way across the country a la Mo Greene. But on the positive side, you won’t have to move half way across the world like Mo Farah! Then again, if you don’t mind getting beat, stay right where you are. Mediocrity requires no change in comfort. There is a cost to greatness, however. Luckily for American sprinters it is within reach – and the wheel doesn’t have to be reinvented.
triggering a heart attack.
Another possibility would be a Mâcon from the other end of Burgundy – try the delicious Mâcon Villages Blanc ‘Les Roches Blanches’ 2008 Louis Jadot at Majestic. This is slightly different, in that it is a little softer and riper than traditional Chablis, but it is still an unoaked Chardonnay from Burgundy showing good minerality and acidity.
I suppose that if you turned this quilt on its side, it would be the "stacked coins" traditional pattern, but since I'm putting it the other way, it looks like books on shelves to me, and that's why I'm calling it Books I Have Read. All the fabrics except the border were in my scrap bin, leftovers from other projects. Once I decided it looked like books on shelves, I scrounged through six or seven quilt shops before I found what I wanted for the border fabric - printed words - in a quilt shop in Napa. I had to have a very wide border in order to make it big enough to cover my double doors.
He sent you a racehorse for Christmas
I wonder why so many parents end up escalating these situations rather than diffusing them, and I wonder if they somehow feel they are entitled to battle against their children and entitled to win, simply because they are parents.
As a footnote, I'll add that Bergen Performing Arts Center is a great place to see a show. It sounds great, and it's easy to get to, but get there early, parking is a big difficult.
Total Running Time: 387 minutes
The last line is an “inside joke” as they are words she would always say when angry. I could go on forever about the things she did, what kind of women she was…but I’ll just say this:
What have I learned since the first post in October 2006?
He said that since the ANC had come to power in 1994, more than 3 000 farmers, mainly elderly and female, had been brutally murdered on their farms.
Useful background:
For those with short memories, you will remember that for the sake of a few million pounds, Col. Ghaddaffi’s favourite son, Saif Islam, was introduced as an honoured guest by one Professor David Held, handed a ghost-written Ph D. on the Role of Civil Society in the Democratisation of Governance Institutions.
Sounds pretty exhausting.
Here he is with his new smile! We can see the new tooth popping through already, so this tooth was definitely ready to come out.
2 transparent
As we walked onboard, the guide explained the dredge was built on site in 1912; first they dug a big pond in Bonanza creek because they had to build her right on the water, she was a floating dredge and once built would scoop out the ground in front of her, enlarging the pond, so she could float forward and continue working. The massive beams and lumber for her construction were transported up from British Columbia and Vancouver Island – trees just didn’t grow big enough in the Yukon to provide the necessary materials.
Ever aback I aboriginal played Guitar Hero on a admirers abject in 2005 I've been absorbed on the instrument-sim sub-genre of music games. If I aboriginal played Harmonix's next-gen aftereffect Bedrock Band, I fell in adulation with the aesthetic, assorted playlist, and abeyant as a affair game. Bedrock Bandage 2 charcoal a accepted action for affable get-togethers at our home. However, while RB2 bigger on the original's interface, there's still affluence of allowance for a added automated and assorted experience. The Beatles: Bedrock Bandage added harmonies, but abreast from that, the blueprint has remained abundantly the aloft aloft the four capital amateur and several spin-offs in the series. Harmonix anesthetized on absolution a Bedrock Bandage 3 endure year, but I'm abiding there will still be one, and actuality is a annual of appearance I'd like to see in adjustment to advance the experience:
The heretic did stand.
Praying to do the best he can
Stop acting out.
This is my 7th year teaching (GASP! Really?! I've already been teaching that long?!). I've been super lucky enough to have taught first grade for all of those years!
The ringmaster’s wife came to see after she had seen the movie.
He is survived by a daughter, Lily Oscar Bergman, and his sister, Wendy Kleckner.
Sure I had permanently damaged my lady business, I picked up the bike and myself from under it. Oliver just stared at me.
"8. Avoid detailed descriptions of characters. Which Steinbeck covered. In Ernest Hemingway’s 'Hills Like White Elephants' what do the 'American and the girl with him' look like? 'She had taken off her hat and put it on the table.' That’s the only reference to a physical description in the story, and yet we see the couple and know them by their tones of voice, with not one adverb in sight."
It is a very straightforward means of deciding whether or not an act is moral.
6 Lost John
I quit my job.
I have worked as a researcher and sub-editor for BBC TV News (via their old Ceefax teletext service) and, briefly, in the newsrooms at Anglia TV, Granada TV and ITN. I have known a lot of journalists. But even I was shocked by the News of the World and other tabloids’ amorality.
In Stavridis’ April 30th blog on the EUCOM website entitled “Sailing on to the NATO Chicago Summit” (the author is an admiral of course), he spoke of recent joint meetings of NATO defense and foreign ministers and of chiefs of defense staff ahead of this month’s summit in Chicago.
Hopefully, it’s not a copy of Aishiteruze Baby.
What these teams have done is to open up the floor 5cm either side of the diffuser, then route the exhaust towards this opening. The exhaust gas gets collected by the coved section of floor and this directs the high energy gasses under the diffuser, to recover some of the losses from the more open diffuser allowed last year.
Feel free to email me at wawadehut@gmail.com if you have any specific questions about starting your own group. It is something that was a huge part of my life at one point and I love to share my ideas of which things worked and which didn't.
I love my planner and enjoy using it and do highly recommend it as a valuable and helpful tool to use to keep life on track and in order.
Ok, my Supermom Lovelies, here is your next assignment: CHOOSE ONE MOM IN YOUR LIFE THAT YOU INTERACT WITH ON A REGULAR BASIS AND FOR THE NEXT MONTH BE HER BIGGEST CHEERLEADER!
So teach us to number our days, that we may apply our hearts unto wisdom.
♦Laura Ingalls Wilder♦
So why was Fregosi well-known as a shortstop prior to coming to New York? As my husband Ed said, Fregosi makes his list “For not being able to say to the Mets, ‘Dude, I’m a shortstop, not a third baseman’ before they traded Nolan Ryan for him.” Plus it’s funny because Fregosi was also traded to the Texas Rangers and Mets favorite Wayne Garrett played third base in 1973. This was the Mike Bordick deal before Bordick was born, basically.
Level 12: MP Cost: 19, Duration: 120 seconds.
In the screaming light of Resurrection!
The discussion took an interesting turn as we spoke about how topography and the introduction of malaria shaped development patterns in the Lowcountry. As malaria was endemic to coastal Africa, enslaved Africans had more resistance to the deadly disease while Northern European settlers were more likely to succumb, thus minimizing the efficacy and profitability of white indentured servants and maximizing that of enslaved Africans.
This week I wrote a story on the Royal Oak company Vectorform. You’ve probably never heard of them, but you’ve definitely seen their work. Their client list includes Microsoft, Nokia, KAYAK, Volkswagen, Jeep and the Associated Press, so…yes, you have seen their work. The employ about 100 workers worldwide and have offices in Seattle, Brooklyn, Germany and India. Their headquarters in Royal Oak is there not only because the two founders are from the area, but also because that’s where they’re finding the talent. The automotive industry may not be what it was before, but our universities are still churning out the talent that served them well for so many years. We’ve got engineering grads coming out of our ears here in Michigan. When we can keep them here, they’re just making different things. Apps don’t require acres of warehouse space, but that doesn’t make them less meaningful to our economy.
“The adaptations to her new flat will continue over the next week then it is hoped that Ms Parma will sign her tenancy agreement and move into her new home, where her social worker will ensure her care package meets her needs.”
Guthrie: will you drop out when you lose Wisconsin?
(Click images below to enlarge)
And most of all, I love my FILES!
3) Chocolate cupcakes. I haven't done this in a long time, but you can also take a package of chocolate cake mix (devil's food seems to work the best) and mix it with a can of pumpkin (not the seasoned kind...just regular canned pumpkin). I know...you're going to think that you should add other ingredients...but don't. Just combine the dry mix with the canned pumpkin. They'll be thicker than what you're used to, but don't worry. Divvy them up in the muffin tins and cook them per the directions on the box. When done, you can store them in the fridge and they taste marvelous cold. When I did this, there was only one point per muffin (again, due to the fiber). You can't taste the pumpkin at all and the cake is really moist. All of the boyfriends I've had have loved these.
Since I am used to the idea of waiting 2 or 3 months for a replay from a publisher, I was a little startled to get a reply in about three minutes which was, “Perfect! I’m probably taking the rest of the day off (there is bread to be baked and spinach and snow peas to plant), but will send you a contract tomorrow, if not later today, for you to sign and return to us. Welcome to ATTMP!”
Inspired by the BBC Doctor Who Proms at Royal Albert Hall in London, the Doctor Who Symphonic Spectacular will be an exhilarating live event, accompanied by a big screen presentation of key moments and specially edited sequences showcasing Matt Smith's portrayal of the Doctor. BBC Wales' Paul Bullock, who produced the previous Doctor Who Proms and the seminal Doctor Who: A Celebration back in 2006, is producing this latest extravaganza.
Pike
Kotkin has looked at the population trends around the world in places like Europe, China, India, Japan and South Korea, and come up with some very interesting conclusions. Unlike these nations, the American population has a higher rate of fertility, assuring new generations to be raised with values that have led to what is called our national “exceptionalism.”
For movies as with books there are too many to list. They include Damnation Alley (based on a Roger Zelazny book and is complete with giant killer roaches!), Def-Con 4, the Mad Max films, Radioactive Dreams, the 1960 film version of The Time Machine (it featured London destroyed by atomic bombs) and Peace On Earth-an MGM animated short release in 1939 featuring a world devoid of humans, who killed themselves off in a final war.
He said it felt like the assault on Meyer had taken several hours and that he was surprised that the police officials in the charge office nearby did not come to Meyer’s aid.
In 1890 Anne's sister, Emily, who was in a state of depression following the death of her husband, threw herself from the battlements of Jesmond Towers and is said to haunt the school to this very day: she is referred to as the Pink Lady.
I am artist of the month at Curves (www.curveslocal.com/882 ) in Point Grey, 2570 Tolmie Street (at 10th) for a month this summer - August 4 to September 4, 2011. I will have 10 to 12 paintings on display for the month. I will give more details on this in future posts.
Now it is up to you. Do you accept all Christ did on that cross? Do you believe in your heart that He died for your sins? By doing so He gives you His life. In 2 Corinthians 5:21 we read,
Kathi Oram Peterson understands the challenges and triumphs of youth. In The Stone Traveler, she has not only created a troubled youth from our day, she has created a cast of enchanting characters from 34 A.D. Meso-America who are beset by the concerns of their own complex time. When the dubious actions of our main character, 16-year-old Tag Quincy, catapult him back two thousand years into young leader, Sabirah’s ancient land, both come to discover that dangers abound in both worlds, and that ultimately, peace for each is based on the same two important elements.
Once the bagpiper plays, we call it a day and a fitting end of another work year, because most people in automotive business have the time off between Christmas and New Years Day. We'll be thankful for a great year in a tough business and to spend some well deserved time with family and friends. The year ain't over until the bagpiper plays!
1. Setting the wall paper of your digital camera with your personal information.
Today, I am joining Sofia over at Sofia's Ideas for Magic of the Mundane. I so love this idea because it totally falls in line with my desire to get back to simple. It can be a picture, a poem or song, a short video or anything else that celebrates the Magic. So often, we get caught up in "where we're going" that we forget to look at the beauty of "where we are."
This day I Remember I Am a member of the Universal God Family. Each human is my brother or sister. I love them unconditionally. They are not required by me to do anything particular for as with them I treat them as God treats me, LOVING WITHOUT EXPECTATIONS, FULLY AND COMPLETELY!
Okay, well not exactly. I shunned church today in favor of meeting with a nutritionist in Santa Barbara at noon. I was shocked when she offered a Sunday appointment, but it allowed me to meet with her without missing more work. Lord knows, I've missed plenty of that! So, I took the pleasant and scenic 1.75 hour trip down the beautiful central California coast at 8:00 am this morning. I met my sister, Priscilla, at Stearn's Wharf and we had a lovely Sunday breakfast at Moby Dick. We had a nice table at the back of the restaurant which was closest to the end of the wharf and so we were farther out in the ocean. Got to see some porpoise, sail boats, birds and saw lots of people out rowing in boats (the competition kind). It was nice. Then we eventually headed over to the nutritionist who enlightened me about a few things and has put me on a program. It's a very interesting one. Leave it to say that veggies and I are going to be getting to know one another much better!
When I look at the ocean form a cliff top, it feels like there are separate and connected things happening. My brain is running through a set of facts that it knows about oceans – tides, waves, saltness; and then goes on to do the connections it knows about – icebergs and the Titanic; fish, dolphins and whales; distances and geography.
Soft Drinks
There's the Shea butter hand cream, because my hands have the texture of an 88-year-old elephant, and the Vick's Vapo Rub I dab under my nose to help me sleep. Nestled beside that are my +1.25 reading glasses. Without these, I have to hold books at a foot's length.
Embossed transfers x 2
Yes or live without life
Ha! What suckers we were to believe David Thompson and the DLP about “guaranteed” green space.
A.M. Overton
1. to keep me humble
What is born of flesh is flesh
Behold, you are angry, and we are sinful;
Happy anniversary husband!
Obama and the dems have ruined our economy, bush had nothing to do with the massive unemployment rates we now see. To make matters worse, our only hope was the republican party. Now it looks as though they to have abandoned the ones who need it most.
Barefoot & Bliss Rub-ons
Red is stimulating, lively and friendly but at the same time it can be seen as angry!
I hung a toilet brush with a 3M hook on the side of the toilet. This is also good for guests who may make an embarrassing mess. And, I also did it in our master bathroom too. It’s so easy for me to walk by and clean it really quick! I very rarely use anything to clean the bowl itself (because it just doesn’t get THAT dirty). Weekly, I wipe the handles and under the cover with Shaklee’s Basic G!
Schrader SM, Ratcliffe JM, Turner TW, Hornung RW. The Use of New Field Methods of Semen Analysis in the Study of Occupational Hazards to Reproduction: The Example of Ethylene Dibromide. J Occup Med 1987; 29: 963-966.
Note: That 45 extra minutes facilitated two loads of laundry and panko-chicken dinner and me not strangling one of my co-workers. Win-win-win.
Our calendar this month has a growing pattern, something that is a challenge for many first graders. In asking them about the pattern, I want to ask simply, "What do you notice?" I don't want to prompt more than that, at least not at first. If I say, "What do you notice about the bears?" or "What do you notice about their hats?" then I focus their thinking. In doing so I take away the opportunity for them to get to the idea on their own. In addition, I may miss some brilliant thoughts they have that never even occurred to me. If they have no idea about the growing pattern after a bit, I can ask the more focused questions then.
* Post it and don’t forget to mention the author and the title of the book
I was told that the patient, who we will call “Joe”, accidentally accelerated on a motorcycle into a tree without any protective equipment or helmet. Joe had no obvious signs of trauma/injury however he did complain of confusion immediately after the collision returned to normal in a short amount of time.
WITNESS: By death.
Closing date: 31st March 2012.
Lastly, why i love dark chocolate? Because i love the bitter-sweet feeling!
This blog is a journey to discovering one’s true self. Once you are aware of your true self, that is when you can tap into your greatest potential and begin living the life you are destined to live.
How would you make airports more fun?
of this poem isn’t still hungry, isn’t me, better yet, isn’t you.
As a Vet, I was honored, I'll say!
Also, we didn't exactly pack right. Two weekends ago, we came here to house hunt. We left Tuesday, got back around 11pm then had to drive another 2hrs home (airline tickets were $400 cheaper here) which got us home at 3am. Then the packers came bright and early 8am the next day. They packed up everything in sight. Even Jacks diapers. I went in to change him and she had already snatched them up. I was kinda mad. I mean, I have a baby, he wears diapers, why pack them up? And they also got to our clothes before we knew what was going on. So all my cold weather stuff is now sitting in a storage unit. And it's oh 30 something degrees here! When we left GA, it was like 80. And we chose here? But it should start getting warmer soon. Right? It is almost April...
Now we move into the characters we haven’t seen before. It’s all very exciting, and we start with little Rue (Amandla Stenberg). She’s gazing downwards and can only be described as a little girl. This poster, for me, shows off the character’s innocence and youth in a way that makes what the Capitol does to her unforgivable.
Incredible nailer! It works flawlessly and I had no jams when building my cabinetry, plus it auto senses jams so you don’t end up with holes, and auto-senses the depth so the nail is delivered perfectly, just slightly below the surface everytime. Highly recommended for any home handyman, and could very well even be used for any general construction work!
“In the coming days we will give details and instances where the media have not been fair to us and why we are going to attack them as well.”
I touched the man’s arm but he shook my touch off as if a cruel thing had pierced him.
6. Pay your partner in cash. Prostitution is very taboo, and what is sexier than things that are taboo? Treat your partner like a cheap whore right after love making and just watch the sexual energy skyrocket between the two of you.
She is my best friend. Our heartstrings are attached in such a way that even silence is understood. To hear the unsaid and to feel the warmth and love without much display is something that we have developed.
Under well-lit conditions, look for any signs of punctures (such as nails or shards of glass) which might potentially lead to a loss of pressure or a blowout. Bulging or cracking might also occur on old tires; make sure you roll your bike forward in order to see all surface areas that come in contact with the road.
Last but certainly far from least, I want to talk about the magnetic triggers that was mentioned yesterday. I had seen for a couple of weeks various people just waking up one day and walking out of their lives. I had not talked about it because it was really strange. It looked almost zombie like… blank stares just leaving. I had no clue where they were going, I was too transfixed on the blank facial expressions… some even had older children along side of them, equally with the same blank look on their face. I am sure, if I had really looked at the expression on my own face as I moved out of my family’s life to New Mexico, I would have looked the same. Had no clue why I was doing it, or what would happen…. I just had to go. I am more than grateful that I did!!
Her passing has reminded me to, again, remember what life is about.
I had two friends pick up some thrift store goodies for me these past 2 weeks - and now I have no doubt in my mind that they know me...really know me! Have a look at what they dropped by with:
I wish there was some way I could thank Danielle and Chuck (and all my other students) for teaching me that all behavior is communication and that sometimes that communication is simply, "that hurts!"
Esther 3:12 Then were the king’s scribes called on the thirteenth day of the first month, and there was written according to all that Haman had commanded unto the king’s lieutenants, and to the governors that were over every province, and to the rulers of every people of every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people after their language; in the name of king Ahasuerus was it written, and sealed with the king’s ring.
Which is too little.
Biff: "You cost three hundred dollars damage to my car and I'm gonna take it out of your ass."
A person, King of Pentacles, with the temperament of an earth or air sign (Taurus, Capricorn, Virgo) or Gemini. More likely a male, Gemini or Taurus, dark-skinned or dark personality, older, gray hair, graying. The person has been previously friendly with her–a relative or close friend. This person wants to “establish a relationship with her.” In a dark or perverted sense, a bit perverted-a sexual deviant OR on the other end, the King of Cups says, “relative, father, nephew, grandfather, uncle, husband. So again, a close friend or family member.
Once all the cabinets were installed, something was still missing. I didn't want to roll/paint all of the plain oak paneling on the sides of the cabinets since I feared it would smear or look extremely streaky, so I just painted out some wainscoting that the hubs cut down to size instead. It added texture to all the cabinet sides and was easy to install with a combo of liquid nails and an air nailer.
I’ve been taking two classes per semester up to this point but I have a path and a plan that will have me graduating in mid-2012. That plan includes taking five classes next semester…
PROBLEM: If Christ had glory with God before the world was, then obviously it is argued he must have existed before his birth on earth.
Sunday I set off to do what I had come to do. Mountain bike. WNC (Western North Carolina) is the best place to mountain bike on the East Coast, and Bent Creek has some of the most extensive trail network there. I rented a 29er (a black Trek Mamba) as this was my first time since NZ riding on really good (read dangerous) trails, and so wanted to a least weakly attempt an image of control. I won’t go through the rough dusty details of that day, but it combined some of the most grueling uphills with the most jaw-rattling wrist jarring downhills, over rocks roots and huge banked turns. I met an awesome journeyman from Chicago who said he spent his years out of school taking whatever jobs all over the country. He had to take a break from mountain biking after a number of broken ribs. He directed me to Green Slick at the top of the small mountain warning me (nay tempting) with the fact that EMTs had evacuated 12 people the year before with serious injuries. It was doppppppeeee!! Some of the craziest 10 minutes of my life. A Ridiculous plummet with a ravine and thick solid-looking trees 2 feet on the left and rocks and dirt on your right. It was at the end of this biking Odyssey after flying over jumps and sliding around sheer curves in an explosion of dust that I finally realized that I’m pretty good.
Typhoon Fighter Jets will begin exercises overLondon today in the lead up to the Olympic and Paralympic anti-terrorism security operation. For obvious reasons the full details of any security measures are classified but the deployment of Rapier surface to air missiles and use of Typhoon fighters point toward the possibility that any 9/11 style attack could be countered by the shooting down of the target. Although this is extremely unlikely to happen, it does raise an important issue for the safety of people on the ground……
*Team up with a friend who has kids of a similar age (or older) and who likes the same curriculum you do. Agree to buy half of the needed items each and swap halfway through the year, or start at different times and share. If your friend has older kids, she might agree to lend you last year's materials...as long as you give them back. It is important to be a trustworthy borrower if you want curriculum sharing to work. Your friend might also agree to sell you her older items at a deep discount if her youngest is too old to use them in the future.
The opportunity was one that I just stumbled upon. I was talking to some of the Irish Dance mom's on St. Patrick's day and my friend, Leah, commented about how moved she was by my sister's story on my blog. One of the mom's, Janine, wanted to know the story so I gave a brief explanation. She then said would you come speak for me. I was a little taken aback, because I had never thought I could speak. This is just my low self esteem on speaking or acting in the public. I thought about and said sure I think I could do this. She explained that she teaches a mandatory class for our county for 1st DUI offenders. Of course we all know that these are probably not really 1st time offenders, just 1st time caught...
For a very brief summary of the theological perspective, see this post on my Tumblr. What I wanted to look at in this post is Wilde’s one practical proposal (in this book, at least) for reforming capitalism in Britain: changing the voting structures of existing capitalist corporations to a “one person, one vote” system, similar to that for parliamentary elections. (Though the more precise description that Wilde uses is “one beneficial owner, one vote”.)
I drove him to the arena and dropped him off. His friend that he sits with when I am not there was waiting and he was able to get our season ticket seats changed to handicapped seating for both .
I have decided to go through the painful task of calling the reservation line every day this week and see how many different answers I can get. Spencer said that their system could update tomorrow even but they don't know and don't have a date that they can give me. If I get the "blackout" answer again then I'll go into my next step... a complaint e-mail.
‘Shut up and watch.’
All I can say is, that this validates my son isn't using. There wasn't a foil to be found. B was furious at the way he was treated. He was smart enough to ask the cop to give him a business card and to write down the time, to show his boss. That cleared him for being late to work.
Thanks for all the encouragement and kind words over the last year.
The 50.1 percent figure is almost double the average teen unemployment rate in June 2007 in the District, when it was 26.2 percent, according to Saltsman.
6.) He thinks I'm beautiful and tells me so all the time. Even when I'm 99% sure it's not true he still thinks it is.
Urobuchi Gen wants to write stories that can warm people’s hearts… But from I don’t know when, I can no longer write works like this. I am full of hatred towards men’s so-called happiness, and had to push the characters I poured my heart out to create into the abyss of tragedy…
The goal of the Partisan Ranger is to wage an irregular war of information and education. Slowly but surely, the dark forces of globalized Marxism have deliberately and effectively worked to erase the true history of these United States. Through their efforts, entire generations of Americans have been robbed of the information they need to be defenders of freedom and constitutional republicanism. Our goal is to turn the tide of the battle by spreading to the people the most effective weapon in fighting the global leviathan: Truth! The truth shall set us free!
I don't know how long we scoured the neighborhood, but at some point the only places left to look for signs were my house and his. My house was clean, so we crossed the street with an air of disappointment hangin' thickly between us.
The day the challenge was issued, I had an apple on the counter that needed to be used, so I made an apple
This group remains at the forefront of non-violent civil society activism in Mauritania, despite constant pressure from the authorities, police repression and arrest of protesters, and occasional competition from other groups of various stripes, seeking to dominate the scene.
Stigma also impacts survivors who have lost someone to suicide. At a time in their lives when their world has been shattered, many have no clue what to say or do. Survivors are not looking for you to “fix” anything, instead they need support, compassion and a lot of love to get through this life altering experience. Many try to comfort but use inappropriate words which add to the hurt. If you know someone who has lost a loved one to suicide, please just be there for them. Let them know you’re sorry for their loss, that is all that’s needed. Let them talk about it openly and just listen, hug them, don’t tell them you know how they feel unless you yourself have experienced suicide – just be a safe place for them to fall.
“Patience is power. Patience is not an absence of action; rather it is timing.
This Peter Slipper business for the last few days has been a bit of a joke. It’s a scandal for sure, but should he resign?
I know, it’s weird to put that in my pet peeves. Pep talks are usually good. But when you decide to sit out a pose and the teacher chooses that moment to encourage the class to “give it all you’ve got!”, well, you kind of feel like she’s talking to you.
Nived Seehamongkol
Here are the rest of the major network shows that are on the dreaded bubble. Or at least the ones I care to comment about. NBC is trying to set a record for unsuccessful shows for a major network, and I could probably have broken up the bubble shows into three lists. Every other network, NBC part 1, and NBC part 2.
Grade: B
I've been posting late, my routine is off...
Stay Safe everyone.
Another issue is I can't ever decide what to ramble on about on here. I thought at first I could make this blog about living with bipolar II disorder, but that got boring quick. Plus I got some criticism over talking about my personal life/sex life with the husband on here. And stupid as it was, I let it get to me.
There was then more of an informal discussion, when Fred Parry asked Mike about Sycamore and then Paul Wissman of the local Scheppers distributor, spoke some about the beers and breweries. It was opened up for an audience Q &A. Then we got to take home a goody bag: the BBQ sauce and rub made in the class, which is Sycamore's recipe used for their BBQ pork belly sliders. Score! I can't wait to try these. We took away the recipes for everything we ate, too.
Then again, I think I've felt that way for the past few months. I really thing GB amazed us with full sized awesome products way too early, and since then, things have been a bit dissapointing.
What's making you happy today?
Also, without guidance, students tend to spend their time inefficiently by exiting games without completing them and moving from theme to theme (pirates, pixies, pets and dinosaurs). Curriculum progression will not happen if students do not complete the games in the Adventure Park. Unlike other computer games, the students will not be offered different games in one theme than in another theme. The students will be offered the same games (that they are currently working on) in all themes. It will be more rewarding for students if they stick with one theme and finish the games in order that they can complete an adventure story. When students have completed an adventure story, they can then move to another theme, if they wish, to start a new adventure story.
enough. You don’t have to wait until the devil meets you on your dinner table
South East Asia has some of the best tea in the world. There are at least six different types of tea: white, yellow, green, oolong, black, and the most expensive is the post-fermented teas, more on that one in a minute.
Now I haven’t told you about my best friend for you to see how great our relationship is. In fact I left out a lot of information about our relationship in order to dive in to the principles of building relationships. In truth we have been through quite a bit together and I trust him with my life. After reading my description of our friendship can you pick out what the key principles are to forming meaningful relationships?
either so you and I can resume
Part of this process is encapsulating experiences of victimhood and making them part of your own story, drawing boundaries around them, trying to articulate new metaphors for self. People seldom have adequate words for this process, he said, so they use metaphors. A central part of truly restoring victims to wholeness is enabling them find new metaphors to transform their narrative of humiliation into stories of honor and vindication.
Grrr.....
Thank you so much for joining me on this fun ride this week!
08/19/2010 BUY 0.01 usdchf 1.0348 08/23/2010 1.0364 +1.54
How do you handle your social media on a professional level? Does your boss “follow” you on twitter? Are your co-workers your friends on Facebook?
The day before Halloween he told me he wouldn’t be able to come back to visit because it was getting colder outside and his mother didn’t want him to play outside anymore. But, he would come in costume to ‘Trick or ‘Treat’ the next evening and I would have to guess what costume he would be wearing. I didn’t guess the right answer and he left without me knowing which kid he was at my door the next night. I suspect it was a ghost because, when I thought about it later that night, it was the one thing I didn’t ask him and the most obvious.
Many congrats from all of the Fab'n'Funky DT and please email us so that we can get your prize to you. Please don't forget to also claim your Challenge Winners badge which can be found in the side bar.
The first natural shampoo I tried was African Black Soap and Oat Straw,
I paid what we owed for her time, the x-rays and the shots and left feeling like I did the right thing for my son. I could have easily made him do what she wanted. Thank God I didn't. I'm more concerned about what my children think of me than the random man on the street... or the dentist.
King Harvest- Dancing in the Moonlight
Vanessa was persistent, though, and offered to send out some GoGo squeeZ to me whether I wrote about it or not.
We have his Halloween costume picked out.
Last night I did fall asleep on the couch. He woke me up, but it was like I was so tired I didn't even want to get up. I still had my jeans and wedge sandals on. He offered to take my shoes off. They have like 1000 straps, so I said, "No I'll get them." I fell back asleep. I woke up at like 12:30 thinking someone was breaking into the house. Gosh I am crazy.
I love the bathroom in my hotel.
This weekend was Mr. Pixie Crust and my one-year wedding anniversary. Time certainly does fly. I really can't express how lucky I feel to have him for a life partner.
Here are my mom and dad and their fuyu kaki (Japanese for persimmon) tree!
After settling in London, Rawsthorne's mind was made up; he wanted to create rather than perform, and this burning desire sustained him all throughout his career, until his death in 1971. His music is fastidious and extremely well organized, it is also deeply observant and contains a sharp edged wit with a style that is very similar to that of Paul Hindemith, with an emphasis on clean instrumental lines and constantly shifting tonalities, and its basis is always that of structural strength and consummate craftsmanship.
You'd think that such exercises involving imaging this other person who used to have my phone number would or could be mildly amusing. They weren't particularly. Perhaps it was because Keri isn't an interesting person. But, then again, I don't think that anyone listening to voice mails left for me or receiving text messages intended for me would think I was very interesting. They'd probably just think that I'm always apologizing for being late and that my sister leaves extremely long, chatty voice mails. And they'd be right.
My Friend: When you mistakenly put all your eggs in one basket, is it ok to throw that basket at something really hard when things don't work out?
My oldest son had an idea to take a picture in the snow with their swimsuits on to
Managing such an eclectic mix deftly is no mean feat yet the quality of the work in The Delinquent is consistently high. Now in its Seventeenth issue The Delinquent is priced at a modest £11 per year (3 issues). In the current no.17 Daniel Adey’s A Postmodernist Remembers stands out as a typically Delinquent poem:
speedy recovery, good sir! and to siobhan, hang in there, missus!
The first year attending the 3 day event, usually mid-summer sailing from Southampton and ending up somewhere between Guernsey and Jersey, it is an eye-opener into the world of eating well, thinking on your feet, eating well, qualifying each of your 38 half-hour meetings, and eating well. Needless to say, I enjoy it for the, er, thinking on your feet most of all.
Thank you to Suzi B for choosing our challenges last month - weren't they fab? This month it's my turn again and we are going
“No.” He tightened his grip on Benjamin’s arm.
Brulee shook her head violently.
For my research, I desired to search out and examine the voice of the poor mother. To do this I used my own blog and journals as a source for auto-ethnography, as well as the blogs of other women like me. I fortified this data with ethnographic interviews with additional women who receive welfare benefits.
I have been to Indonesia because I competed in a debate tournament there. I have also briefly mentioned Indonesia in my posts, but, again, these are mostly captions on photos. I really love Brownie Kukus! There’s like a thick layer of cheese on top and a really delicious brownie layer below. I sooo love it! I want to go back to Indonesia just for that.
My dermatologist gave me a free sample of this after being diagnosed with facial eczema. Here are the pros: gentle, non-irritating, fragrance free, won’t burn even on inflamed skin.
Ann Voskamp's book, A Thousand Gifts, contains a quote that has changed me. "Make every moment a cathedral giving glory." Every moment can be holy if I allow my reaction/response to line up with God's Word. When I can rejoice in my trials, glory is given to my Heavenly Father. It becomes something beautiful and something that can be used. Something holy. Even the broken and ugly and fearful things. The trials that threaten to overtake me are transformed into miracles when I give thanks. Within each trial there is room for thanksgiving. I just need to search for the hidden treasure.
2. Grab bottom of skirt and pull it up to desired length. The fold shall be your hemline.
And she is hungry. But, you knew that.
But there are still bands out there that can put together a hell of a good album, and this series, like my old bliss-out posts, is a little celebration of albums, particularly the ones that are well-built... and perhaps it's an elegy for them too, now that the album as artform is becoming less and less relevant in the face of music videos and EPs that can boast a higher hit-song to track-listing ratio (available for 99 cents on iTunes!)
Further to my comments about the shop itself – sorry, “retail space” in case there are any interior designers, social environment engineers or other retail marketing types listening – I really was impressed by the layout, the look and the general vibe of the place. Some of the big players in the booze market, as well as retailers in general, might like to get the number of the people who thought up the ‘feel’ of the Cloudwine Cellars operation. I should clarify at this point that I have only visited the South Melbourne shop and I guess the other two could look like a poorly constructed bush outhouse; but I am thinking NOT.
My award winning Double Chocolate Stout w/Raspberry (named Midnight Chocolate Bar Stout) is down to less than a gallon left and here is the replacement. It should be ready for entry to the Bluebonnet, and I'll take the remainder and charge it on the beergas to serve at the contest's Club night.
no I only rent
Review: On this latest release, Gombi Zor (named for a toy bear found in their farmhouse/studio), the mixture is heavy on hybrid Afro-Indian grooves, jazzy improvisation, European and Indian folk melodies. The flexibility of their improvisation (their "leaves") is anchored by the traditional grooves (their "roots"). Mola Sylla, originally from Senegal, provides the African root with vocal and percussion.
Hm, the model for the new Filippa K menswear spring/summer season! (I've seen him on billboards and he's the one you see when you first click over to the website, before entering!) Swoon, thud...
Far from the embarrassment I expected to feel on being greeted by "real" runners, I have received all sorts of acknowledgments and small shows of solidarity that made me realise that anyone who goes out and puts one front in front of the other is in fact a "real" runner just as much as the next person. These range from those solemn nods you give someone you don't know but don't want to ignore, sweaty, red faced grunts and winces, full on beaming smiles and on one occasion a round of applause as I crested a really steep slope to meet a guy just about to descend it (note: most motivational acknowledgment ever!! Way to make me finish my run with a massive grin like the village idiot)
You listen for more than 30 minutes without looking at the TV (+10)
44. What was the first thing you thought of when you woke this morning?
Okay, so just how did I get to this sad point? To begin with, I was born in Charleston, West Virginia in 1955. I’m of mixed racial heritage, with my mother being half Black, half American-Indian, and my father being half Black, half White. You do the math. Apparently, my appearance has lead most people to assume that I’m White. As you can probably imagine, looking the way I do while living and growing up in mostly Black communities through the 50′s, 60′s and 70′s had a profound impact on my psychological development. Wanted or not, the perspective of ‘outsider’ was forced upon me.
Since Pepper has been out of town for a few days, the Bouie-poop-walk duty has fallen to me. As we rounded the corner and approached the gate on the side street this morning, I noticed the gate to the back courtyard looked a little whoppy-jawed (translation for those not fluent in Southern: misaligned; crooked; off-center). Sure enough, upon closer observation, I found the tongue was out of its little slot, meaning that someone had tried to unlatch the gate, to-wit:
I finally resorted to Round-up - seriously, I pulled and pulled and pulled without making a dent, so finally only pulled close to things I wanted to save and then hit the rest of the area with killer - many square feet.
Paris: If it's behind closed doors ... You bet! I'm quite good at handling things behind closed doors.
Block by Taker and this time he nails the Last Ride…WITH AUTHORITY but that only gets two, so it’s Tombstone City but Edge floats through that and nails an Edge-o-Matic for two in a fantastic counter. A collision knocks both men down and it’s Taker first up and he’s going Old School but the referee gets bumped on the way down.
Add the flour and salt to the potatoes, then add the water with the dissolved yeast. Combine the ingredients with your hand until they come together into a sticky dough, then knead in the bowl, using one hand to steady the bowl and one hand to knead, until the dough is smooth and well blended, about 5 minutes. It will still be moist and a little sticky.
adam said...
I have not done any stitching but I have finished up my colour challenge and it will be on its way tomorrow (once I get my partners addy again...see what I mean lol) .
So one day passing through Barnes and Noble with my best friend, Ange, we came across this book, and well we were pissing our pants! .. so me being the impulse shopper i am, had to buy the book! .. this book has tons of quotes from women about their best friends, that there is sure to be a quote for every woman out there about the friends they have in their lives .. "this book dishes out the good, the bad, and the funny on one of life's closest and most confounding bonds - the best girlfriend." ..
A large number of people were needed to work on the military project, so a town was built for the workforce and their families. Jackson Square was the original commercial site of Oak Ridge, and was surrounded by housing. By 1945, the population swelled to 75,000. The town included 300 miles of roads, ten schools, seven theaters, 17 restaurants, and 13 supermarkets.
For the main course James had the mussels (£12) which came in a light fragrant Thai sauce which he found a refreshing change to the traditional garlic/wine/cream sauces and these came with a portion of nice crispy, chunky chips.
Austin Zealot Inquisition picnic is coming up on Saturday Aug. 8. Woohoo!!!
As well as the petition, the council has already received 11 written objections. One of those was from Howard Morgan, who has lived on Druidstone Road for 37 years.
Murdoch, Derrick. “It’s a Crime: An Uncritical Love and Affection for British Pubs and Literature.” The Globe and Mail. January 5, 1985.
The Introduction is but a single page, serving to inform the reader that the book is but one of several featured in the Lovecraft Country series, and that it takes much of its content from Lovecraft’s tale, The Shadow over Innsmouth, and the stories of August Derleth, with Ross adding his own creations to the mix. The introductory section also establishes the book’s place in the canonical Innsmouth timeline (after the events of The Shadow over Innsmouth but before the government raid on the town), with suggestions on how to use the included scenarios in conjunction with the rest of book to create a mini-campaign arc between those two events. Lastly, the author thanks various people for their contributions to the project.
As one parent told me: "We are not saying that this is an actual danger to the children. What we are saying is that if corners are being cut and proper procedures are not followed, there are some real concerns."
2 ½ sticks (10 ounces) unsalted butter, cut into tablespoon size pieces, at room temperature
“Chess is a war game,” he said. “You’ve got to have that conniving and crushing instinct in you. I have a lot of anger and I express it in that.
Using my Stitch Witch, I finished off one long side of each black linen strip, folding over about 1/3 to 1/2". Then, while the panels were ALREADY hanging, I moved my ironing board under each panel, and using the Stitch Witch again, steamed/ironed each panel so that the finished edge of each black linen strip was 16" from the bottom (allowing about a 2" or more at the bottom and sides, to cleanly fold and adhere them behind the panel.
Silk Hankies are a joy to work with and the resulting yarn is beautiful, both shiny and textured at the same time.
The Truth Will be Told
In analysis, ‘a certain kind of resistance consists in the patient always being reasonable and refusing to have any understanding for the logic of emotions,’ while at the same time there are ‘intellectual resistances in which patients try to refute the theoretical validity of psychoanalysis instead of seeking to clarify their own mental life.’ Again, Freud found that there were ‘patients who practice the art of sheering off into intellectual discussion…who speculate a great deal and often very wisely about their condition and in that way avoid doing anything to overcome it.’ Such intellectualizations of the therapy may be part of wider manic defenses ’of overwhelming importance, since they are primarily directed against the experience of psychic reality, that is, against the whole aim of the analytical process’; while a further difficulty may be that, as intellectual defenses give way and feelings do emerge, ‘the patients, not accustomed to affects, are easily frightened by their new experiences.’
Diabetes and hypertension run very strong in my family, and it’s imperative that I remain cognizant of the amount of sugar I’m consuming. I’ve recently started to reduce the amount of sugar I consume, and as a result, I’ve been noticing some great progress with my health and weight loss, but some of my foods were tasting extremely bland. The main thing was my protein shake. I was used to it tasting like a chocolate, mellifluous dream post my workouts.Per the notion of a friend of mine who is also a personal trainer and an avid runner, she suggested I start drinking sugarless chocolate almond milk (even make my own from scratch) instead of the one with the added sugar. After reducing the sugar, it tasted so bad that I couldn’t get through one cup. I knew I couldn’t continue like that, and it’s imperative that I consume my protein shakes because I’ve adopted a vegan diet, and protein is very, VERY crucial for me. While looking for new ways to make my protein shake taste better so that I could actually drink it without gagging, I found PB2. If you’re like me and love peanut butter, then you will love PB2. PB2 is powered peanut butter, and it has all of the flavor but hardly any of the calories, fats, carbohydrates, and sugars. Take a look for yourself (source):
ii) to behold the glory of the Lord, verse 18. Behold means to contemplate, to focus on, to gaze upon. It also means to reflect what we are looking at as the NAS BIble translates, beholding as in a mirror the glory of the Lord.
I was happy to oblige! I LOVE it too and there was a crispness in the air asking for it!
Denise: I live in the United States. I’ve not found where I live to be a help or a hindrance.
Some accounts state that wedding rings did not become common until the 11th century. Others believe the ancient Romans were the first to offer wedding bands, but they were a symbol of ownership used to claim women. Historic accounts give a little more romance to the Romans. Roman betrothal rings were once made of iron and called "Anulus Pronubus." They symbolized strength and permanence. It is also thought that the Romans were the first to engrave their rings.
1 15 oz. can black beans, rinsed and drained
Julianne was at a birthday party. I'm starting to meet other parents. Our moods are improving greatly. We still hate the house, but that's another post for another day. Thing is, if we had won the lottery last month ~ Va would have been a distant bad memory and we'd have been back in Fla. If we won lotto today I guess we'd have to buy two houses. One here and one back in our lovely Florida ~ so we'd have the best of both worlds.
“Resident Assistant called Security regarding possible marijuana in Sunderland Hall.”
I’m not just some wandering soul
This was taken last year at sunset at Eilean Donan castle.
His belongings include 3 computers and a printer valued at $800, furniture valued at $5000, kitchen appliances valued at $3000, and $300 worth of medical books (which he obviously never took the time to read).
week 4:
As I type this, I’m surrounded by boxes. We’ve rented a storage building and are preparing to store most of our belongings until early September. Ty and the boys will be in the house until school ends. At that point, they’ll begin the process of preparing to join me in Florida. Ty is doing a Live Event Painting! for a wedding at the Modern Art Museum in Fort Worth on June 9. After that, they’ll head my way. No doubt by then, I’ll be almost sick with missing them. That being said, if you’re in a position to toss Ty a gig or two or a design job in the next 6 weeks, please do. Moving is expensive. We’ll both be working as much as possible. I’m counting on that excellent Disney overtime policy.
i’m learning that it never slows down, does it?
Here are two modules that seem to want to go together, except the one on the right isn't big enough. I put them on the design wall to see exactly how much needs to be added. I decided to add some at the top and some at the bottom, because it would make a more complex pattern.
It’s a cracking series, it has lots going for it but to be honest I was a little disappointed with this book for one particular reason, that it feels like Kelley is setting up for a separate Savannah Miniseries that has to be not only read in order but could potentially stretch on for quite some time. It is something that is going to have to be handled carefully and I hope that she hasn’t bitten off more than she can chew especially when you add a Winchester Supernatural theme within.
Down by the River
Unlike much of the rest of my life, class offers me a safe place to “fail” — to try something new, to do it poorly, to take gentle and helpful instruction, to go away and think hard about why I couldn’t even see clearly that which was before my eyes for so long. My fellow students are planning to show their work soon, but I’m in no rush to join them. I don’t need or want that validation — or that pressure to do it right or well or good enough.
“AN INTERNAL INVESTIGATION to determine how this ad was approved for distribution and at what rate; we also recommend you assess the level of conflict of interest involved in this particular case. We assume that you will take the appropriate disciplinary action with the employee(s) involved.”Wow – he wants to control our internal systems that would touch on ad sales, human resources and more. He also wants to control what ads we show on our network. His letter goes on.
"This is what a white c*nt looks like after we f*cked him up"
On Wednesday, Amari learned another feeling. We were over the hill in Ukiah where I'd just purchased a few items at Ross, including a new pair of flip flops for her. Although I explained we'd have to wait, she wanted me to put them on immediately and began to take off her shoes on the floor by the check out counter. I snatched her off the floor with one arm, held my bag, keys, and her old shoes in the other, and whisked her across the parking lot where I unlocked the hatchback and dumped the contents of both hands into the back of our car.
I remember that turtle. Timmy and I found him in the vacant lot at the end of the street. Big old box turtle. We carried him home, and I immediately brought him in the house. Mom said I couldn’t possibly keep him in the house. But I did. She let me. For a little while anyway. I guess she knew I’d grow tired of hearing him scratch around in his box all night long. And I did. Timmy and I took him back to the vacant lot and left him right where we found him. Outside my mother’s house. That started the bringing-home-stray-animals habit I still have today.
First, popular media tends to promote “sensational finds” which challenge the Bible. Most recently, James Tabor and Simcha Jacobovici made headlines by claiming to have found an ossuary decorated with a fish, implying that it was Jonah’s fish and that the image was a reference to the resurrection. The tomb at Talipot was also promoted as the “Jesus Tomb” since a number of ossuaries were found with names similar to Jesus and his disciples. The findings of Tabor and Jacobovici have been discredited (the fish is a wine jar, their photograph was sideways and edited so the handles were not visible), but the media reports scholarly response to these sensational claims less prominently, if at all. For example, my local newspaper, The Grand Rapids Press, ran the Washington Post story with the headline “Another Lost Burial Site? Filmmaker Claims Tomb Linked to Jesus; Followers.” They did report that some scholars doubted the claim in the article, but the headline is all most people read.
"Umm, how did I break my foot without noticing?"
“The only reason this balanced approach isn’t on its way to becoming law right now is because a significant number of Republicans in Congress are insisting on a different approach, a cuts-only approach — an approach that doesn’t ask the wealthiest Americans or biggest corporations to contribute anything at all,” Mr. Obama said in his address. “And because nothing is asked of those at the top of the income scales, such an approach would close the deficit only with more severe cuts to programs we all care about — cuts that place a greater burden on working families.”
The day’s marketing will hopefully lasts me for a week till the next marketing day….
So I called my cell phone again. This time I separated the bags so I could tell which one was ringing. Did I mention that it is harder to locate missing cell phones in dark trash bags, as opposed to light colored trash bags? And I’m not profiling anything here. It’s just the plain truth.
I took my time figuring out exactly what I wanted for this one (over a year, to be exact), and I think it's a perfect fit for our room.
Nothing at all.
The global warming hoax is now killing peopleBy Friday, February 10th, an estimated 500 Europeans had died from the freezing weather gripping the continent. This is the price they and British citizens are paying for embracing the global warming hoax, spending billions for wind power when they should have been building coal-fired and other sources of energy to heat their homes and businesses.Well, neither of the articles Alan links to blame the deaths on wind power, although they do mention, "The increasing toll of hypothermia over the past five years coincides with a surge in energy costs, especially gas prices which have gone up by 40 per cent." This seems counter-intuitive, since gas and coal, unlike wind, are plentiful and inexhaustible resources which should only become less expensive as their use becomes more widespread. But, as we shall see, victims of seasonable but extreme European weather froze to death directly as a result of windmills, just like Frankenstein's monster, except he burned to death. (Spoiler alert: according to eyewitness Una O'Connor, he actually didn't)
I was able to brew my "Clean Out the Pantry Ale" last weekend. Yes! According to the recipe calculators over at Tasty Brew my target OG was 1.055 - I came in at 1.056. Success!
Mendocino Brewing Company White Hawk Original IPA
I love my rural hometown!
“So did we sin or not, Father?” enquired a now more-confused-than-ever Milligan.
And yet, in other ways, it was a miraculous day. I fished for the first time with lures I’d made myself. I saw no fewer than 10 whales gorging themselves on sand eels. At one point, a pod of twenty or so dolphins surrounded our fishing party, jumping out of the water in a feeding frenzy. There was homemade capicola, whimsical cupcakes, and a very good nap.
How neat is that? The web page, not the phone. Well, the phone is pretty awesome too.
So, here I was on a bitterly cold early March morning at Alton Towers theme park. On this cold and misty morn, I had driven my son to Alton Towers to attend a rather lengthy interview process. Not exactly thrilled with the idea of sitting in my car for up to three and one half hours, I ventured for a stroll into the sleepy, off-season theme park.
I know the answer is inside me, but its almost impossible to hear through all the confusion.
As we are about to celebrate the purification, we are writing: you should celebrate the feast days.
This, then, is one of the key findings of this investigation: that Searchlight is essentially a catalyst (albeit a very willing and forceful one) for these different groups, for generating an institutionalised hatred towards self-assertive and stubbornly independent native Britons.
Qabqab was a remote and semi-isolated mountain place. Life here was simple and unpretentious. The residents connected with the pristine nature around them. They cultivated the scarce fields where the lands were flat enough for basic agricultural use. Farming was a job that guaranteed self-sufficiency, it produced enough to sustain oneself but not enough to trade and barter. But self-sufficiency was what most of the content people of Qabqab sought. And so farming for them trumped any other interest. It also made them travel less, and mingle with their neighboring villages even less frequently. Politics did not figure in Qabqab’s social life. There was no hierarchy of power. Disputes, as rare as they might be, were settled amicably. When veteran travelers and rovers sat center-stage at the village square to talk about famine, war and political dissent and events that took place elsewhere, the residents of Qabqab listened in amazement. For them, these things were inconceivable and unheard of.
The peeling away of the layers of the subconscious patterns that have been carried within you are now beginning to be dissolved and dissipated.
hmm…it have a bad ending…I guess sad ending…that boy…he died at the end…cause of loss of lot of blood…n the girl…I dunno if it end same with her o not…because..she hurt herself too…
“I. . .love you . . .”
Anyone else go from winter to summer and miss out on spring altogether?
They say a song and a scent can stir a memory faster than anything. A little Loverboy- Lucky Ones will take me back to my teen years quicker than you can blink, but if I’m going on a musical journey, I much prefer a trip to the places that Amazing Grace takes me.
v) feel very bad when I see people of my generation not behaving properly with their parents and not giving them enough emotional support.
A gorgeous Art Deco piece of simply wonderful.
Of God’s people, only Noah was left. God’s response to the severe situation was a 120-year-long last chance, during which He had Noah build a graphic illustration of the message of his life. Nothing like a huge boat, built on dry land, to make a point!
You have a masterpiece inside you, too, you know. One unlike any that has ever been created, or ever will be.
On the malicious prosecution against him, Numpang was asked to appear before a magistrate’s court in Serian on Dec 15, 2010, and was charged by the public prosecutor with “criminal intimidation”.
Happy Sunday,
8 weeks ago, this house was scrubbed and empty. The carpets were professionally cleaned, the baseboards were hand washed and a vacuumed every corner. Mostly, at the time I saw dead ants and spiders. Nothing that concerned me. After the full shampoo (partially purchased to prevent pest problems!!), I used an entire giant container covering the garage as well as the entire house. What did I find? 2 dead roaches, endless dead spiders and a good number of still happy-go-lucky ants. No big deal – all was well.
Why is it that Donald Duck wraps a towel around his waist after his shower, but doesn’t wear pants..
Glenda And The Test Tube Baby 4:57
Starting your day the right way!
My godmother will have been in the hospital for two weeks this Thursday! I am very bad at situations like these. She is not doing well! I was finally able to visit her last night. It was so very hard and I had and still have so many questions. She has to be sedated but once my grandmother told her I was there she opened her eyes as much as she could and she tried so hard to speak! Completely crushed my heart! She is strapped down due to having tubes everywhere and once out of sedation she always tries to pull them out! They had one for breathing, one for eating and were pumping green an black "crap" out of her lungs! I lifted the blanket and held her hand and just prayed that she had more time left here with us and that she would pull through. Smoking and alcohol play a big part in why she is fighting so hard for life. She is strong and I will continue to pray that she fights this and comes out stronger than when she went in. I am going to visit again this week and I'm hoping to find out alittle more. I am very lucky to have not had to experience many situations like these or have any close family pass away! So this whole situation is just very hard for me. I have to accept that it's a day to day situation and if and when it's her time to go she will be happy and in a better place.
“GOD DAMN YOU, YOU BASTARDS!” I roared, slamming my fist into the steering wheel. “YOU’VE KILLED THE ALL-YOU-CAN EAT OVER-FIFTIES BUFFET!”
“We have confidence in the law. We never say our leaders are innocent,” the former health minister added, saying he could not comment on the case specifically as it would be subjudice.
That is why I’m singin’ to warn you
1 ight
Copics used
2 onions, diced
YOU SAY YOU DON’T NEED NO KISSES, GIRL
When a dark stranger begins watching her from afar, and her prankster best friend becomes strangely protective of her, Meghan senses that everything she’s known is about to change.
''Dirty already la! So stupid everything also cannot do properly''
I struggled to make some saucers to match the cups and in the end used left over pieces from the centre of a letter 'O' from the Big Shot Alphabet Simple Letters! I've accented my tea cups with hearts from the Owl Builder Punch and flowers from Itty Bitty Punch Set. I left the outside of the card quite simple:
I spotted this ribbon at the Portsmouth Fabric Company. Check them out online or in person. It's one of the best fabric stores I've been in. When I told them this was to be a gift, they offered me the use of their sewing machines since I was on vacation. I passed due to time constraints, and it's a good thing I didn't know I'd have access to a machine ahead of time.
So, what does a mom do when her child loves tags....gives her more tags of course. I was at Target a few months ago and discovered the taggy blankie....a generic little thing that was selling for $10 a pop!
It’s liquid silver seeps into the ground.
Recently, I was the recipient of a random act of kindness. Yes, in Toronto. In the FINANCIAL DISTRICT no less. I know. The shock of it all was so great that it apparently prevented me being able to blog for two weeks. Or clean my apartment. Or file my taxes. What? It was a significant event, people.
See that very tall apothecary jar on the top... that was a garage sale find for $1! And it even came with a "ambiance" layer of dust and grease for free, how did they know I would appreciate that for my party? LOL! (and yes, I didn't clean it...yet... I am waiting till after the party)
If you crave potatoes:
What's next?
Cigarettes? Ahem. "Yes. That would be the one.”
“We are so excited to have Teresa as our keynote speaker for this year’s Sorghum General Session,” said NSP Chairman Terry Swanson. “She is an excellent advocate for agriculture, and is a valuable addition to this year’s program.”
Band: Converge
Searching for my soul
With my taking up running and having entered several races, my kids have been wanting to become 'runners' too. They've run, walked and biked along side me several times and were very excited when we told them they could enter their own race this spring!
In many ways this is analogous to the political EU principle of subsidiarity only do things in the center when there is a clear need to. To a large extent, this also allows national governments to decide for themselves what kind of relationship they want with their ccTLDs. I note that in Europe a variety of models exist, with some governments running their ccTLDs and others maintaining an arms-length relationship with a private sector operator. Both approaches seem to work, which is a endorsement of the principle of subsidiarity in this area of Internet governance.
20 - Carlton Fisk DK
Dear Madam,
The gift of administration can help leadership accomplish great things. Good administration can save time and money. In a volunteer situation, the gift of administration can bring professional type skills to many events, meetings and projects.
One particularly summery place this year in Brooklyn has been Fort Greene Park, often over shadowed by it's bigger cousin Prospect, Ft. Greene Park has been a constant source of music, community and more a few times, really good eats. Below are pics from the Soul Summit and a few from the Fort Greene Fest held back in July.
I am so excited.
Now, to be fair, I’m wearing no make up, and it’s first thing in the morning. I’m still wearing my bathrobe, but I cut that out so that you could really hone in on the important thing in this picture: my nose. See what I’m saying? It really is bigger than normal.
For the LORD is righteous; he loves righteous deeds; the upright shall behold his face. (vv 4-7)
Just please don't tell me that "everything happens for a reason" or "God only gives you what you can handle"... if I hear that again I may kick some serious a$$.
What a shock it was to enter the 'learning procedures' of the modern world. Some gadget, book or extremely 'clever' person will give you that edge. There were books, methods, pills, the canes of teachers and pressure of all sorts that 'pointed', fairly forcefully to the new way of learning.
The snowflakes were die cut from the background paper, glittered and a clear gem added to the centres.
The South-South leaders, who were supporting Azazi, it was learnt, argued that the NSA said the obvious, when he blamed the PDP for the Boko Haram crisis.
A reader recently wrote and said that her ex, and abusive man for over two decades, insists that his only problem is anger. He claims to be a Christian and is verbally repentant about his anger. The only problem is that in the same breath that he “confesses” his anger, he lays blame upon her for leaving him. She can fully expect him to continue his other various abusive tactics as he has opportunity. Nothing has changed.
Bar seats have been used for many years as a practical informal option for family dining as well as to lean on a bar with a beer in hand but the ins and outs of buying them can be involved. Cream bar stools play key role in giving an additional look to your bar or restaurants. If your place is hefty an adequate amount of, subsequently you can depart with somewhat intricate styles in the sphere of furniture. But in place of a narrow place, it’s recommended to obtain smarter designs with the aim of may well accommodate the customers with no interfering the pass ways.
The hairstyle starts with razoring in the back. This is where your hairstylist with strategically cut the top portion of your hair as if producing a short hairstyle. This is important to give your hair a fluffy appearance on top. Depending on how you want your hair to look, your hairstylist may layer your hair the rest of the way down so that the blend looks more natural.
No, really. It is.
Finally got these babies shipped to me by the Theory store in San Francisco. Sort of reminds me of Céline Resort and these Calvin Klein ads with Lara Stone where she's wearing white orthopedic shoes (but they're perfect). Buying shoes is kind of a big deal for me.
Passing another burnt out, bullet ridden medical marijuana business, I wonder just how many of these medical marijuana places were in operation around the city before the KCAP virus. I guess they do not call it the Emerald City for nothing. That thought makes me chuckle a little bit.
schedule that would be better for them in the long
Bike for about an hour (adjust the seat height often up and down to lube up the joints)
Founder
Dear Groupon,
The Path of the Builder
For his career, Seau amassed 1,849 tackles, 56 1/2 sacks, 18 interceptions, three forced fumbles and 21 pass deflections. Seau spent 12 years with the Chargers and then was traded to the Miami Dolphins, where he played from 2003-2005. Seau announced he would retire in 2006, but four days later returned to the field after the New England Patriots requested his services. He played for New England for three years and officially retired in 2009.
I am aware of no statement, by any neighbor, accusing any of the players of involvement in “other sexual offenses”; the Coleman Committee Report established that they had no such records.
Now the news you’re all dying to hear: more Nier.
On one hand i'm glad to have completed another spread - on the other i keep thinking..'but i want to do something clever, something really good'.. I don't think i've got there yet.. Do you have that conflict?
In May 2010 I decided to leave my job in Australia and travel around the world before moving to the USA. This journey ended up involving travelling in 18 countries on 4 continents (North America, Europe, Asia and Australia) and taking me around the world 1.5 times over a 12 month period! I wrote a number of travel emails from that trip and I thought it would be fun to revisit them with some additional info and photos. The following blog is Part 15 of that journey (Bulgaria and Poland).
Sources: IMDB / Wikipedia
Isn't that wild?
...You still think you are the cutest thing you've ever seen while looking in the mirror...
Our people rarely see themselves affirmed in adverts or on TV, only dark people without English features unless they are advertising our women to the world as whores. We are not supposed to identify with ourselves. The elites need have no conscience about bringing immigrants here to take our jobs by undercutting wages and pushing us out of our communities if they convince themselves we are worthless.
There it was again.
Readers unfamiliar with Glasgow should note that Tennent’s is next to the city’s Necropolis, which should explain the Hammer Horror-style gravestones in the foreground of the illustration.
You’re happy one minute, you’re crying the next. The next you want to punch small kittens in the face. Maybe that’s a personal thing. Either way, I don’t think the jewels being shaken causes this much madness to a persons demeanor.
it’s a pity, our earth is dominated by a “higher intelligence” whom emphasizes on looks.
food intake No. 3 (12pm)
The same goes for participation in other kinds of forums happening online that are relevant to your subject matter and interests.
Sourcing Fabric-
On Sunday Barack and I raced, and I won. I ran so fast my body transformed itself onto another plane. We ran, he started off behind me and I just said to myself stay ahead, stay ahead and my body became a flat thin box w/ my arms and legs coming each precisely from a corner. And I didn’t know how long I could keep it up, but I was going to try—my whole sight concentrated on the lamp post when I felt him slow and yell you beat me, at first I thought he was giving up, but then I realized he’d meant the lamp post on the left and I’d really won! The feel of the race was exhilarating, but I didn’t feel very victorious. Barack couldn’t really believe it and continued to feel a bit unsettled by it all weekend, I think. He was more startled to discover that I had expected to win than anything else. Anyway, later in the shower (before leaving to see The Bostonians) I told him I didn’t feel that good about winning, and he promptly replied probably cos of feelings of guilt about beating a man. In which case, no doubt, he’d already discovered the obverse feelings about being beaten by a woman. Nevertheless, it was a good metaphor for me, despite, as I confessed to Barack, that in some ways it would have appeased some aspect of my self-image to have tried and lost. But I didn’t; I won.
I had areapas in san francisco once and enjoyed them and looked at the recipe in viva vegan but thought it sounded like too much word so avoided making them until a few weeks ago. I once tried to make pupusas but found them too be too fiddly but these are completely different. So easy and are quicker to make than corn tortillas.
There are guest rooms for company, which are white and clean and neat.
My favourite manufacturers have to be prima, sassafrass and Crate, my style tends to be quite grungy but very girly!
Remember they are a lifelong commitment! They have feelings too.
“Danny, Daniel, what's the difference doc?”. At this Daniel looked pretty mortified.
sour cream, optional
From a strict taste perspective, this wasn’t the best burger that I’ve tasted but it wasn’t too bad either.
It was hard not to sit and absorb the memories, but the passing car gave urgency. I jammed every journal and notebook in with the pictures, then put one suitcase with clothes in the trunk of my car and took the rest on my shoulder down the sandy path to the Grahams’ house. Sweet people. He retired from the Air Force and they moved for the sun and salty air. Both should have died long ago from arthritis and other maladies, but they were out walking the beach every day like two faithful dogs, paw in paw.
Tens of thousands of Louisiana government employees and their families are concerned about the future of their financial securities. Students, parents and so many others are likewise worried about the future of higher education.
One day when Scott Rigsby was eighteen years old, he was riding in the back of a pickup truck that was towing a three-ton trailer. When the trailer was clipped from behind by an eighteen-wheeler, Scott was thrown over the side and dragged 324 feet before being pinned under the trailer. Later, at the hospital, his right leg was amputated—the first of twenty-six surgeries he would endure over the next ten years, including the loss of his other leg. Doctors said it would be more than a year before he could expect to walk again—let alone run.
tanguero: "physically, you are clearly in recovery, but i sense that your mind is not quite... it's still scattered."
12. Your fears? demystify
Joeby is the younger sister of my Unoa Latea Friday. She needs to be wide-eyed and innocent looking. Surprisingly I couldn't find many sculpts that were readily available for such a character - which I was not expecting. I figured that would be an easy style to find. How wrong I was! I feel like I've been hunting for days.
Well…..considering mum is a complete fruitloop.
I'll let you know how it turned out next post.
How awesome is that!
The eggs he set aside. A small pan had been heating on the second burner of the hot plate. Rainer saw it was wispy with smoke. There was a square platter next to the plate, filled with day old rice. The addict scraped the rice into the pan, to sizzle in the thin layer of oil. Smoke stung his eyes, and the faint nutty aroma coming from the pan reminded him for some reason of his grandmother's kitchen. A trace of grin as he stirred the rice. The only seasoning he had was a small amount of dried chiles he kept in a tan stoneware jar next to the hot plate. He sprinkled a small pinch over the rice, the dark red flakes seeming like spots of blood against the dirty white of the rice. A wave of dizziness overtook him; his head he rested on the wall. Blood. That would be his penance, the dark communion he would receive to atone for his sins of abuse and gluttony.
2. Rock And Roll Fantasy incl. Ticket To Ride & I Feel Fine
I almost fainted when I saw who produces polycarbonate! No other than the infamous Bayer! (producers of aspirins, toxic chemicals cotton is sprayed with in India, and the infamous Gaucho, alleged beekiller, that corn is treated with!)
This is a question I tend to worry about -- especially in regards to main characters. With secondary or minor characters, likeability isn't as big of an issue. After all, you're not stuck in the head of the protag's best friend the whole book. If you don't like the best friend, no worries. If you don't like the protagonist, that's a bigger problem.
The neighbors sigh and shut their windows. SAP envisions the terrified, starving cat--lost and lonely--and sadly sniffs.
i was determined.
You’re not!
leaves of old
“I do not feel that it would lead to a cohesive and calm environment in our village. Community relations would not be enhanced.” she said.
Some days are worse than others, but most days are better than others..
Tomorrow is my birthday, the first Day of Spring! Usually the weather is crummy, cold rainy, or even snow. Not his year! Here in Chicago Land, we are having very unusually warm weather, It's been in the 70's to 80 for a whole week! Florida weather! Unbelievable! Because we are Chicagoans, we a little leary, that we still might have cold weather coming, but for now, we'll take it, and we're loving it. The trees are budding and the flowers are blooming, Yea! People are wearing flip top, shorts, and tank tops. Usually, This time of year, we are bundled up, wearing sweaters and winter coats.
A JOHANNESBURG policeman has been arrested and charged with murder after fatally shooting a bystander during a routine police check.
Indeed, we are all sick. Not because we are really suffering from an actual base disease, but because we are all forced to live in such a truly fucked up environment. We must accept degradation and debilitation to get ahead. We have been made to believe that happiness is debauchery, and that satisfaction is not attainable through traditional means. We have mistaken fraternity with family, and lust with love. We are subject to visual stimulation so subliminal that the thought of it affecting us mentally or emotionally has been subliminally equated to crazy people and conspiracy theories. We have been incrementally displaced from the family units and clan structures of old, and systematically estranged from the concept of honor and integrity. We have been tossed into Agenda 21, stacked and packed into sustainable regions, with concrete lots and roads leading to well-manicured recreation areas, malls and mini-malls. And we have been disjointed into welcoming the familiarity and comfort of chain stores like Walmart and Burger King as we travel around the country and indeed the world; the concept of cultural and geographical uniqueness abandoned from our consciousness like so many small businesses and farms, in lieu of convenience, un-ceremoniousness, and traditional and local cultural upheaval.
Article 5
The mom lets out a pronounced and exasperated sigh.
Paper - Kraft - Paper Studio, K & Co. Merryweather, Prima Meadow Lark
It's been a dismal fall for new TV. While a lot of returning shows have come back strong (The Good Wife, Community, to a lesser extent Dexter and How I Met Your Mother), most of the fall pilot slate was dire, and even promising and prestigious series like Boardwalk Empire and The Walking Dead have proven underwhelming. Amidst this dross and disappointment, however, I still managed to find two new series to get excited and even fannish over. Naturally, they've both been canceled.
I thank my friend Tom for providing this article that refutes the Jehovah’s Witness belief that we are living in a special time. Part 2 can be read here.
You could learn ways to make it even more difficult for them.
So - what are your thoughts on drinking, teenagers and the trouble that comes with it?
Once inside, Rayanne and I had the first moment to talk about the boys.
"Ruination Day, Part. 2" by Gillian Welch - From her masterpiece, Time (The Revelator). In my Top 10 favorite CDs of all time here.
So, when I received an 0ut-of-the-blue e-mail from a distant cousin I've never met, I sat up and took notice!
Meanwhile, they say, feckless fathers who refuse to be named on a birth certificate should – like mothers who decline to name a father – be liable for a fine, expected to be £200.
This is an area where I usually set my cruise control at 57, still watching #2. I realize I'm catching up to him which seemed odd. Now his brake lights flash a couple of times, and as I get closer he pulls to the right at a paved driveway that just goes into a field, and while I'm pondering this, he does the abrupt left turn in front of me.
- 12″ x 8″,30 x 20 cm
I didnt even want to have sex no more, i wasent confident no more about my body and i just wanted for someone to help me.
Disclaimer: This fictional interview is fictional. The names are also fictional. The characters are based on total auditory figments of my imagination. They are not indicative of any race; creed; religion; association; nationality; sports team; hair color, natural or otherwise; political party, denomination, or affiliation; sexual wish list, orientation or preference; educational level, background or intelligence; gender.
Watching Belle and Liberty guard them feed and care for them and usher them off into the world has been the most remarkable experience for me. I have learned of nature and nurture, joy and anxiety, freedom and faithfulness.
On the bright side, we have a modern combi boiler which is likely to be more efficient than our old back-boiler. However, we also have an electric cooker. So we’re anxiously awaiting our first bills to see how much energy we’re using and how much it will cost us. As tenants there are some things we can do to save energy. We can turn the thermostat down, keep the heating on a timer and make sure we’re wearing woolly clothing before we put the heating on. Plus we could install low-cost draught-proofing around the home, such as thicker curtains around the windows and draught-excluders around doors.
Documents show that among a string of expenses claims he used a special Mayor’s credit card to pay for a £282 dinner with Ed Balls, then a Labour Minister, at a top London restaurant. Afterwards he dipped into public funds to pay for his £30 taxi home.
What is the writing scene like in Baltimore?
Just a twin thing that happens from time to time. Not an interesting post, just a twin challenge that happens to be an annoyance.
98th Assembly District
I have it on good authority that the Obama administration will be creating a new commission to regulate all sports in the country. This new administration will save the taxpayers money as adjusted estimates are that its formation will only cost the taxpayer 75 billion dollars, down from 85 billion dollars initially projected.
Students at UF have already organized protests, and have created a website dedicated to saving the CS department. Several distinguished computer scientists have written to the president of UF to express their concerns, in very blunt terms. Prof. Zvi Galil, Dean of Computing at Georgia Tech, is “amazed, shocked, and angered.” Prof. S.N. Maheshwari, former Dean of Engineering at IIT Delhi, calls this move “outrageously wrong.” Computer scientist Carl de Boor, a member of the National Academy of Sciences and winner of the 2003 National Medal of Science, asked the UF president “What were you thinking?”
I am a visual learner so I hope you'll appreciate a review through pictures.
Cut into slices and enjoy!
I am graduate student so I spend the remaining time reading, writing and prioritizing the tasks of a Graduate student (BIG STRUGGLE).
A good example of this recent serendipity some in this form. On Monday, I spent almost an hour on the phone with my grandmother, making sure I had remembered some stories she told me when I was much younger, catching up on news…. Basically making up for the fact I didn’t dare drive out to Syracuse and visit with our beat up old car. And as I was recording some of these stories onto the computer (for a blog post, for posterity, and for my steel sieve of a mind), this NPR article, “Rasputin Was My Neighbor”, about so-called “Human Wormholes” came through on my Facebook feed.
Knowing if given a chance
I looked at him, the way his eyes crinkled at the corners even though his mouth stayed so serious. He had a little dimple near the left side of his chin. I kissed him, and he wrapped the heavy wool blanket tighter around us as the moon rose brighter in the sky.
If you have truly asked Jesus to come into your heart.
Regular backs
Melt butter in saucepan, add onion and salt. Cook for a short time until the onion is softened and make sure to keep stirring. Add next 3 ingredients and then the potatoes. Stir and cook for about 5 minutes, until boiling. Reduce heat to medium-low and simmer for 15 minutes, stirring only occasionally. Discard bay leaves. Transfer to greased 2.5 L corning ware dish. Cover with foil and then put glass lid on top. Bake for 20 minutes at 375 F (190 C). Take it out, remove foil and cover the potatoes with Gruyere. Bake uncovered for 30 minutes until potatoes are cooked and cheese is golden. Let sit for at least 5 minutes before serving.
As she took to the stand, the unidentified woman was visibly distressed as she told jurors McClain, 38, from Irvine, California, slashed her boyfriend repeatedly, beating him to the point of brain damage.
Dog: Woof woof
In retrospect, I wish I would’ve brought Santa a gift. He was just so genuinely kind. Maybe I can still go back . . .
After waking up from the surgery to remove the bullet, Kevin realized that his career and his marriage were probably over. As they wheeled him into the recovery room, Sheila was waiting for him. The moment she saw him her heart hit the floor as she spoke. “Kevin, are you ok? Dr. Davis told me what happened and Baby. I’m so sorry. Is there anything I can do to make you feel better?” Before Kevin could speak a word, he saw a familiar couple walking into the recovery room. Tammy and Bobby Blair were standing in the doorway with flowers in hand, asking if Kevin was going to be ok. Kevin wasn’t sure if he was having a nightmare, or if he had simply lost his mind. “Why are you smilin’ like a goat in a briar patch?” Kevin asked. Bobby bent over and whispered into Kevin’s ear. “If you keep my secret, I’ll keep yours.” Kevin was relieved and distressed at the same time. He wanted to put Bobby in prison for shooting him, but he didn’t want Sheila to know what he had been doing when he was shot. He looked at Bobby and reluctantly said, “Deal!”
By the way, I turn in the first half of my book in about ten days, and I plan to go on a new-brewery odyssey and catch up on all these wonderful new places I have unforgivably ignored. I have no doubt some blogging will result.
So on balance, I feel that people who tell fat women to "create a waist" with a belt (looking at you, Tim Gunn!) or to never wear short skirts if over 40, can shove it. So can people who complain that models are too thin (their body type is certainly not common, but neither are Marylin Monroe's) and say clever things about men liking meat (because this is what you are, ladies: a product for male consumption). And maybe, just maybe, everyone should just stop telling women what to do, or be, or aspire to. Because the tricky thing about humans is that we all have our desires and interests and inherent worth, and in 2012 I think we can all agree that women are a part of humanity.
On November 17, at 11:00, a handful of students—some walked out of classes, others were free in any case—assembled in the wind and cold on the Library plaza to demonstrate their concerns, prior to joining a town-wide "Occupy" rally on the Common in the afternoon.
Training helps to make the world safer and make friends around the globe. The Russians military needs to learn how to respond to terrorist attacks. Their past responses to Chechen terrorist attacks inside Russia has proved fatal to Russian civilians. President Obama is right to share US tactics with them. Trust and cooperation at this level will result in cooperation on other issues, such as nuclear nonproliferation and European missile defense.
Metering Mode Spot Metering
~Experiment with a medium that you can always edit later if you must. (A blog post for example). Is it easier to share something with the world without it being perfect, knowing you can continue to make changes? How might that apply to other mediums?
In keeping with that knowledge, this week’s episode of Castle was all about “zombie walking,” which sounds like some sort of live-action face-to-face version of Urban Dead. It was actually a pretty fun episode, zombie makeup and all, but it was a disturbing coincidence after that car underwater episode. If the next episode involves Beckett getting trapped on a Ferris wheel or having a fatal car accident due to a sneezing fit, I’ll know they really ARE reading my blog.
By then, it would be too late for the Malays to wake up from their slumber.
It was sweet and delicious and perfect for after a long run. I'm totally hooked on putting fennel in my juice right now. It really compliments everything I've added it to, and this was no exception. Yum!
Tempura (two ratings): Vegetable Tempura: 8/10, Shrimp Tempura: 7/10
And since 365 todays means 365 tomorrows, and you might get really busy and forget about these funny little dreams by the time 2012 rolls around, I thought I’d set up a mailing list and do the remembering for you!
Jumping to conclusions about someone,
Oh, now, not our darling brothers and sisters across the pond in the United Kingdom! They can’t be racist, too, can they?
Dedicated to public use by
Time passed and my Grandma died at a very young age from surgical complications. At first, Grandpa Beek kept in touch with my mom and me.
grace to all, salvation brings.
For example: I’m on a row doing something but I know if i continue in this path it’s going to lead to failure. I am not afraid to fail. I keep doing it. Then I fail. I stress out about it for 2 or 3 days then I’m over it.
My attempts at baking bread at 6000 feet have produced mixed results. All along, my goal has been to create a healthy, hearty sandwich bread that toasts well and doesn’t have the consistency of lead. While I’m not there yet, I think I’ve found a new path to pursue with this book: Artisan Bread In Five Minutes A Day.
MAY 8 - 12
Not quite as shabby as I'd prefer but it's a good start. Once I'm in the swing of things again, I'll be bringing out the sewing machine and cutting up strips of lace. But for now, I've kept this fairly clean and simple.
As always, I welcome comments and opinions and do not discourage those that differ from mine.
But the recipe kept calling my name. First, it had been featured on Good Morning America as Sam Champion's favorite macaroni and cheese. And it came from the Dinosaur Bar-B-Que, which is a very popular restaurant here (there are also locations in Syracuse and New York City). I've only been there once or twice, but I remember the food being excellent and the atmosphere fun (it often has live music, mostly blues). I've also had some of their catered food and it's been heads and shoulders above most catered food I've had.
Hello everyone! While many of you have already been experiencing an unusually warm and early spring, here in the Pacific Northwest, it's been a bit cooler than normal. Until today, that is! The sun is shining, temps are in the low 60's, birds are singing, and the cherry trees are blooming and just gorgeous!
The Falun Gong is a dissident religious group labeled a cult by the Chinese government, while iodized salt is one of the most common household items in the modern world. But it was also part of a rampant rumor in China after last year's nuclear plant meltdown in Japan, in which people falsely claimed that iodized salt could reduce radiation poisoning.
Date: 21st April 2012
I know. It's ugly. Drips and all...I am so ashamed. :)
The glisten of the little steel instruments catching the glint of the
We would like to thank all the artists that participated in the Orsoni Prize this year. The mosaics showed an amazing array of unique talent and accomplishment. All submissions will be posted on the Orsoni Fan Page on Facebook, Orsoni Smalti Veneziani.
Here’s something that’s really scary. We have an election this fall which could determine the possible direction of our country over the next century and the future of our children, and guess what? We only have two choices. We can only vote for either President Barack Obama or Mitt Romney! It doesn’t get more frightening than that.
Lately I've been too busy to go grocery shopping so I dug around the cupboard and found a box of Shake & Bake, and making it reminded me of the old days. I made it today and it tasted pretty good. Considering that you bake the chicken and not deep frying it, it's actually pretty low cal and healthy. In the time it took me to walk Chewie, when I came back, it was done!
Our soldiers, our sailors, our airmen, Marines, Coast Guardsmen and civilians in Afghanistan have done their duty. Now we must summon that same sense of common purpose. We must give our veterans and military families the support they deserve, and the opportunities they have earned. And we must redouble our efforts to build a nation worthy of their sacrifice.
BF: Thirty million or so.
I'm gonna cheat a little with some and combine two from the same book.
A butternut squash is difficult to prepare. Use a carrot peeler to get the skin off the squash and go deep enough to remove all the light yellow colors. They will be stringy otherwise. It will not be too difficult then to cut in half, remove the seeds and then cube in uniform sizes.
1. Roster has 9 spots left. 10 picks + any cheap free agents from now until training camp.
Rather than indulging into the “if only” excuses to justify inaction, we would all be better off by taking a hard look at the problem, and possible solutions that are within our reach.
Next came the rouge cheeks, the pink eyes and the brown lipstick. Every make-up tip I’ve ever read in a beauty magazine was banished with the swish of a make-up brush. Heavy liner was applied to my eyes and then came the spidery false lashes followed by several licks of mascara.
One of the things any half decent management course teaches you is the importance of presentation. As a management student, the importance of presentation had been driven hard into Harvi’s head. Now that he had got some inkling of the nature of the challenges, he realized that it was critical to present himself as a proper hero. And one of the aspects of creating the right impression was proper attire and gear. So he logged on to Amazon.com on his mobile and ordered for himself an impressive looking long sword, a majestic cloak that claimed to offer protection against physical attacks, poison and magic and a few other hero accessories. This almost wiped out all his savings. However when the goods arrived he could not help feeling it was money well spent.
SEATTLE — Washington state’s worst outbreak of whooping cough in decades has prompted health officials to declare an epidemic, seek help from federal experts and urge residents to get vaccinated amid worry that cases of the highly contagious disease could spike much higher.
The recap
Campin Critters
If anyone has further suggestions or has created their own system for organizing photos, please share!
The city of Austin began its recycling in fall 2008, but it didn’t have the right type of plant to process those recycling materials as reported by the Statesman. On Nov. 4, 2010, the Austin City Council approved the new ordinance to come to effect on Oct. 1, 2012. The new ordinance would affect all commercial and family properties within the city and require them to recycle office paper, plastic grade, corrugated cardboard, aluminum and glass.
Daniel Bard (2-2, 3.72 ERA) will be making his start tonight against Brandon McCarthy (1-3, 3.23 ERA). This game is the last game of the series against the Athletics. Red Sox will get a one day break, before they start a three game home series against the Baltimore Orioles. Bard’s ERA against the Athletics is 0.64 over fourteen innings.
as what we knew a life ago.
Gigwork – A snappy way to answer the question “What are you doing these days?”
Skillet Apple Pie with my variations
Confrimed speakers include Ricardo Acuna of the Parkland Institute, Jessie Cardinal of Keepers of the Athabasca, water expert Kevin Timoney of Treeline Ecological Research, and geochemist Karlis Muelenbachs.
After an elaborate sting operation involving a Ramrod regular named Skip (Jay Acovone) fails to bear any fruit–though it does provide us with the sight of giant black man wearing nothing but jock strap and a cowboy hat–the film shifts into stake out mode. Following a hunch, Steve decides to tail another Ramrod regular during the light of day. Yeah, that's right, daytime. Was I saddened by the fact that the film is no longer taking place at night? Sure I was. I mean who doesn't love to watch gay men in leather jackets acting tough after dark? And, as everyone knows, the daylight is a cruel mistress, one that will eventually destroy the darkness. I think the lyrics to the Meri D. Marshall smash, "My Obsession," perfectly encapsulate my feelings on the subject: "Strangers in the daylight / Lovers after midnight / This is my obsession / I live for the darkness, I must confess."
Ava continues:
His replacement, the immortal Leo Zack, was 5-32 in two seasons, the latter season ending with 16 straight losses. Three of his five career victories came against Newberry. He also lost a game to Newberry, the school that during this time was better known for being the victim of Frank Selvy’s 100-point game.
Current city: Some would refer to the place I live - Johannesburg, South Africa – as the crime capital of the world. But I think we lost that status when we successfully hosted the 2010 FIFA World Cup!!!
* 1 tbsp garlic
Gabriella said that today we should play "tired" at Grandma's and all bring our pajamas. Perhaps keeping a 2 year old up all night is not a good idea, but she was oh so snugly all through the movie, and so wanted to be us for our "party".
I'll be back again someday...just not sure when. Our goal is to finish The Other Baby Book and have it published by August!!
* Dr Michael Jones, Course Director, MA Music Industry Studies, Institute of Popular Music, University of Liverpool: “Music and The Legal System”;
And today Kate called -
"to be nobody but yourself in a world which is doing its best, night and day, to make you like everybody else means to fight the hardest battle which any human being can fight; and never stop fighting." e.e. cummings
This book was full of suspense…which just made me want to keep reading to find out what was going to happen next. I would highly recommend this book to everyone! And, another great feature of the book…there are discussion questions at the end…which would make it a great group/book club book to read!
3) Chicken gets VERY lethargic and eye infection gets worse
Anyway, enough excuses - see my effort above
Joss Ackland (White Mischief)
We can do this by starting with the context of the verse. Our main text for this morning is in the first chapter of what is now called the Upper Room passage because it is in the Upper Room, where Jesus and His disciples are on the Passover night during which He will be betrayed, arrested, and later crucified, that Jesus makes this remarks. The twelve really do not understand what Jesus is saying (and Judas simply is no longer listening at this point) but what Jesus is saying focuses on what God is going to be doing when Jesus returns to Him after the resurrection which is still a big unknown for the twelve.
Treasury out of money on Aug. 2; AAA rating at risk
Coat of Many Colors – Dolly Parton
5. QMF
It might be cruel irony that Edwards' musical legacy is largely forgotten while the cartoon cricket to which he gave voice is a household name 70 years later. But the truth is that Ukulele Ike's music is a delight. This collection of 25 songs, including all the ones I mentioned here is a great testament to the singer.
Edit "Queen for a Day" for the QSPACE anthology, check.
· Knowledgeable in web services
Feta cheese is traditionally produced in Greece made from goats milk. It is an excellent source of protein, calcium and B vitamins, whilst containing a third less fat than other types of cheese. Calcium is thought to stimulate abdominal fat breakdown, and is essential for keeping bones and teeth healthy and strong.
Might even enjoy himself in the meantime.
Belinda Jean Berloni, 47, faces
More than once a week on occasion.
Tolling for the tongues with no place to bring their thoughts
I find the drawings and illustration of Chris Piascik to be wild and fun, and I think he is a prolific thought monster. I love his video and watching the effortless flow of his work.
We had some more good conversation after reading these responses. I especially liked that more than one student noted that we’ve really just made up momentum and energy. We talked some about being able to cleverly choose snapshots (states) so that there is no change in thermal energy between them and the convenience of having conservation of momentum to pick up the slack. We talked a little bit about infinite sets of numbers (for example: the set of odd numbers is infinite; the set of even numbers is infinite; the two sets have no numbers in common). We thought a very little bit about problems where, while both Conservation of Momentum and Conservation of Energy would each be satisfied by an infinite number of solutions, the two infinite sets would only have one solution in common (the one that actually happens).
So far, we have had a really great Summer with a great balance of fun, play, and a little bit of keepin'-the-cobwebs-out school work.
What if …. I got stopped by a police officer for going 80 MPH in a 55 MPH speed zone?
Did you notice there were not even any crafts on the list yet??
that man who couldn’t love his wife
A red-cross knight for ever kneel'd
and road kill.
Happy Friday Everyone! Sorry for the delay on getting this post on, we just have had one of those weeks. If you are new here and unfamiliar with the Art Showcase welcome! Each Friday I host a link up called Art Showcase. This showcase is a way for us to display our kids art work in what I like to call the gallery. We have so much fun looking all the amazing creations that are added. If you would like to join in please link up below. Any type of creativity is welcome. I hope you enjoy this weeks creations!
I've improved slightly, but mostly I have felt more doubt and stumbled more. Insecurity causing incapacitation.
I confess that I am addicted to Q-tips. I could very likely win a prize for having the cleanest ears in the world - or at very least, the cleanest ones on the block. I think my obsession stemmed from a traumatic episode of "Untold Stories of the ER". I would elaborate, but I'd hate for you to run out to the store and buy up all of my Q-tips.
1 fix
6) Launch at least one new eBook - Still intending to do this, assuming I have an appropriate item to prepare and launch. I'd say this is down to about an 85% probability, as it depends on multiple factors. Still, it's high on my priority list.
Like all the resources and product highlights I do on this blog, unless I state otherwise (and I will always do so), the opinions I'm sharing are my own and I am not paid to endorse any retailer or product. I don't claim to know what's going on with this retailer, nor have I done my own independent research into this issue. I'm just happy that my post has become a place for disappointed customers to connect with one another and hopefully find resolution.
How is it legal? To charge an ititial $100 for a used book? And then buy it back for $10-$15, and then to resell the same book for $100 again? How is it only worth something when it’s in the hands of big-textbook-company? Should the value of an item remain stable no matter who’s hands it’s in? I guess there are a lot of examples of this *cough* cars. But it doesn’t make it right.
Oh my gosh, these people were junkers and hoarders to the MAX! Just like US!!!
Separate dough into two logs, and flatten into rectangles. Add a log of almond paste in the center of each rectangle and roll dough around it. Pinch edges and turn the loaves seam side down.
they were taking a quick break from jumping across the hotel beds.
“I am in the early stage of Alzheimers, and I want to go back to England. I want to go back to Southampton, and I want to spend my last days there. But I have no money. I bought this villa when prices were high. There is now no market for it. I took my UK savings, and converted my pounds into euros. That was a disaster, too.”
Recently, I did a guest interview for Rosemary Gemmell's excellent Reading and Writing blog. Rosemary asked me about researching my new novel, The Amber Heart and wondered how much my Polish background had informed the writing of this book. It brought to mind all over again, my charming great uncle Karol Kossak - that's him above, trying to squeeze his immensely long legs into a small horse drawn vehicle!
Golden lion tamarin
Good Afternoon, how are you all? It was my first day back at work today, after the half term, which went really well although I will be flagging later as I had to get up really early. I'm feeling loads better today, still got a scratchy throat though,
Atmosphere
Is Cabin in the Woods a horror film game-changer?
And our small circle closed in tightly around Stephanie's belly, lifting her up in prayer, in song, in laughter, and in silliness.
Away, reflecting on you
Writing-wise, the dialogue is pitch-perfect – the boys genuinely sound like teenage boys, the girls’ voices match their ages and personalities – and Marchetta manages to create clear and vivid scenes of the school and the town and especially of the surrounding bush without overloading us in description.
Thanksgiving has come and gone. Christmas explodes into our lives through the commercialism of retail greed. Between now and Christmas, common days will pass by filled with sacred moments hidden in all the neon-flashing extravagance of Christmas.
Praising God today. Of all days Good Friday. Reminds me a bit of a couple years ago. We thought my Mom was dying on Good Friday. We made all the preparations, etc and sat with her all weekend in the ICU. On Easter Sunday she made a miraculous (by all accounts) recovery and there was little to no explanation. We got to enjoy being with her for one more year.
I looked where he was pointing. Towards the middle of the village was a huge Oaken Citadel, built hundreds of years ago. Craved into the wood of the halls where pictures of the Forest, and some of the strange creatures inside it. I saw Wolves, and the large monstrous creature my Father spoke of. I saw pictures of Butterflies and other creatures I was familiar with. The Forest truly was a wild place.
3. Beale street Blues
Anybody who thinks they're getting paid 100K just to drive a trunk is woefully naive of what the fuck a war zone is, and has absolutely no conception of what it'd be like to be a member of a country that's just been invaded, no matter how right or just or patriotic the invaders feel.
I was working in a cafe, I met this fun loving biker guy. He was an recovering alcoholic attending NA and AA meetings. We lasted 5 months.
Monitoring of message texts and sentiment is a key com­ponent to measuring the effect of your social media efforts, and it can also help you get acclimated to listening to your community. We talk about this in greater detail in the sections Listen to Your Community and Measure Results.
I love a good card layout...
Well folks, I certainly met alot of moms. And I do not think I fit-in well with them at all.
So here is my real mommy after birth checklist.
"Hey, check it. It's 11:11."
